The effect of injecting morphin in right vagus dogs is to slow or practically to stop auricular systoles, the circulation being maintained by ectopic, independent, ventricular contractions. The function of conduction is, relatively speaking, undisturbed. The fact that after morphin injections there is little or no disturbance of conduction in right vagus dogs and a profound one in left vagus dogs may be used as a factor in distinguishing between them, especially when there is a reduction in rate greater than usual in left vagus dogs. The effect on left vagus dogs is to slow the rate of the auricles moderately and to increase the length of conduction, so that partial auriculoventricular block or complete auriculoventricular dissociation results. These are precisely the results that have been obtained by faradic stimulation of one vagus nerve, the other being divided. There are slight differences in the results obtained between the two methods, but the explanation for these is probably to be found in the differences in the nature of the experiments. When faradic stimulation is employed, the stimulus is applied a short time only,-in our experiments for periods not longer than ten seconds. The occurrence of the maximum effect is sudden and does not provide for a gradual introduction of the ventricles to new conditions. In right vagus stimulation the ventricles usually stop beating. A gradual introduction is, however, not always necessary, as may be seen in figures 5 and 6 of the paper (4) already quoted, where idioventricular rhythms began without delay. Another difference between the two methods is found in the degree of effect produced on stimulating the left vagus; in the faradic method the change in conduction varies from mere lengthening to a condition so profound that complete dissociation results; these degrees have been described. The morphin method usually produces only incomplete dissociations. Twice only was complete dissociation produced. The similarity between the results of the two methods is sufficiently close to render it likely that in obtaining them an identical mechanism in the heart is involved. It may, therefore, be concluded that the inconstant action of the vagus resulting from morphin injections, called "ungleichartig" by Einthoven and Wieringa, appears so on account of the fact that the predominating effect of morphin may be exercised now on one and now on the opposite cardio-inhibitory system, and not, as was suggested, on account of a shifting of predominance from one to another of the fiber tracts in the vagi themselves. The explanation offered as the results of this series of experiments differs from theirs. The results obtained substantiate the conclusion reached in the former series, that the two vagi act differently. A fact relating to the mechanism of the right vagus nerve can now be added, from a consideration of the cardiac mechanism in right vagus dogs, namely, that derangements in conduction result, to a very slight extent only, as the effect of the influence of the right vagus nerve Although no solution of the production of the extreme grades of sinus irregularity seen in morphin intoxication is offered, the failure of this rhythm to be converted into a more profound irregularity may be explained. There seems little doubt that the occasion for the occurrence of an independent ventricular rhythm in these experiments was due to the slowness of the auricular rate resulting from morphin injection. But in the cases of sinus irregularity (Nos. 683, 685, and 700), the rate of the auricles was never sufficiently low for the ventricles to initiate an independent rhythm. The lowest rates recorded in them were 66.3 (No. 683), 85.7 (No. 685), and 91.4 (No. 700), and it appears that before an independent ventricular rhythm occurred in any of the experiments, the auricular rate had always fallen below 41 (Nos. 686, 688, 697, 698, 706, 715, and 721). On the other hand, the ventricular rates in the cases of sinus irregularity were higher than the highest idioventricular rates observed and no advantage could consequently have been gained by the onset of a new rhythm. No. 683 was an exception, but the rate in this case exceeded the idioventricular rates of all but Nos. 702 and 706 and was only 11.1 beats below that of the highest recorded. Whether sinus irregularity itself is a morphin irregularity the result of a sino-auricular block, in the sense of Eyster and Meek, has already been discussed.
Specimens of human blood taken during the paralytic stage of poliomyelitis and post mortem have proved not to be capable of infecting Macacus monkeys. Specimens of monkey blood taken at various stages of experimental poliomyelitis have not proved as a rule to be capable of infecting monkeys. In a single instance, among ten tests, infection was secured with a specimen of blood removed at the beginning of the paralysis on the seventh day following an intracerebral inoculation. When suspensions of the spinal cord from a paralyzed monkey have been injected into the brain or simultaneously into the brain and spinal canal, the blood removed from one to forty-eight hours later failed to cause paralysis after intracerebral injection. When large volumes of active filtrate are injected into the circulation the blood remains infective for seventy-two hours at least, but may be no longer infective after ten days when the paralytic symptoms first appear. When, however, the filtrate is injected in smaller amount or when a filtrate of a less active virus is employed in large quantity, the blood either fails to convey infection or conveys it irregularly. It is only when overwhelming quantities of an active virus are injected into the blood that paralysis results. The injection of moderate doses is not followed by paralysis, although the virus may still be detected in a blood sample twenty-four hours after the injection. The existence of a mechanism capable of excluding the virus within the blood from the central nervous organs is therefore inferred. Infection is accomplished far less readily through the circulation than by means of the more direct lymphatic and nervous channels of communication with the central nervous system. Several series of feeding experiments conducted with the biting stable fly (Stomoxys calcitrans) resulted negatively.
1. Sodium soaps prepared from olive oil, croton oil, cod-liver oil, linseed oil, etc., have the property of inhibiting the action of trypsin and leucoprotease. 2. The activity of these soaps is dependent upon the degree of unsaturation of the fatty acids and is in proportion to their iodin value. 3. Saturation of the acids with a halogen (iodin) causes a loss of this property. 4. Soaps of the saturated fatty acids tested do not have this influence on ferments.
1. Tubercle bacilli contain unsaturated fatty acids which, when saponified, have the property of inhibiting the action of trypsin and leucoprotease. 2. In proportion to their iodin value these soaps are more active as inhibiting agents than the soaps prepared from linseed, olive, and cod-liver oils. 3. The activity of the soaps is dependent on the presence of unsaturated carbon bonds. 4. Saturation of the soaps with iodin destroys their inhibiting action. 5. Soaps probably play an important part in the production of the condition known as caseation in tuberculosis.
These studies, like all studies of the kidney, are difficult of interpretation because of the impossibility of producing a pure glomerular or pure tubular nephritis. Arsenic nephritis in its early stage is physiologically a vascular nephritis, but anatomically tubular, and shows in this stage almost no retention of nitrogen, although studies of urinary nitrogen indicate an increased catabolism. On the other hand, diphtheria nephritis in the early stages is anatomically a nephritis with marked involvement of the glomerulus anatomically, but it is physiologically a tubular form, and in this early stage there is little or no nitrogen retention although studies of metabolism indicate that protein catabolism is increased by the administration of diphtheria toxin. In both cases, however, there appears to come a time when the excreting power of the kidney is exhausted and nitrogen accumulation occurs in the blood. This is much less marked in the arsenic nephritis, with less tubular change, than in diphtheria toxin nephritis with its marked tubular degeneration. This same late accumulation of blood nitrogen is seen in immune serum nephritis, where the tubular changes are persistent and relatively more severe than the glomerular change. It might well be said that this is no argument for the influence of the tubules in the excretion of waste nitrogen because of the general exhaustion of the organism as a whole and of the kidney in particular, and that no positive conclusions can be drawn is indicated by the opening sentence of this summary. Tartrate nephritis was at first considered as purely tubular; but the appearance of occasional glomerular change, as mentioned by Wells in one of his animals, and the fact that the presence of precipitated albumen in the subcapsular space, pointed out by Pearce and Ringer, probably indicates an increased permeability of the tuft capillaries, all lead to the conclusion that although the tubular change predominates, there is, possibly, slight alteration of the glomerulus. This form of nephritis shows the most marked retention of nitrogen, persisting even though the glomeruli show almost no change, tending to clear up with the progress of time and evidently also with the repair of the tubular change, and bearing a direct relation to the dose of tartaric acid and presumably with the degree of tubular change. It must be remembered, however, that the nephritis in the cases of greatest retention is a very severe form, and this again clouds the physiological interpretation of the results. The study shows no reason for altering the conclusions of our earlier studies, but from the interpretation accorded above it appears to throw more stress on tubular change as determining nitrogen retention. It confirms in addition the value of the methods used for studies of this type.
It is possible by means of repeated injections of uranium nitrate to produce in the cat a subacute or chronic nephritis which can progress to a fatal termination and show in its course increasing accumulation of non-protein nitrogen in the blood. This nephritis differs only slightly from the spontaneous chronic nephritis of the species. Repeated doses of diphtheria toxin produce a subacute form of nephritis with only temporary or slight retention, but nevertheless anatomically a well defined nephritis. The spontaneous nephritis studied resembles more closely that produced by uranium nitrate than that produced by diphtheria toxin both histologically and from the standpoint of blood analysis.
1. The plasma of guinea pigs treated by injections of rat sarcoma exhibits a toxic action in tissue culture preparations on the cells of both rat sarcoma and rat embryo skin. Similarly, the plasma of guinea pigs immunized by injections of rat embryo skin is toxic for cells of both types. 2. Injection of rat blood immunizes against both sarcoma and embryo skin, although not so strongly as injections of the two tissues. 3. Guinea pigs receiving injections of either chick embryo heart or intestine develop cytotoxic substances for both of these tissues. 4. The preceding findings tend to show that cytotoxins formed after the injection of different body tissues into a foreign species are to no extent specific for the tissues injected.
In our study of the histogenesis of the miliary tubercle developing inside the liver lobule in animals that have been stained vitally while inoculated with bovine tuberculosis, the controls enable us to recognize the manner in which the vital stain affects the liver. There is therefore no possibility of confusing the effects due to the organism with the effects due to the dye. It is, however, of interest to note that the effects are closely related. The vital stain alone is able to produce gradually some of the same changes that occur with far greater rapidity in experimental tuberculosis. Although in a few hours the Kupffer cells of tuberculous animals begin to react to the disease, in the case of normal animals stained vitally they do not do this until after the third or fourth dose of successive daily injections. After many days, nevertheless, the vital stain alone produces enlargement, proliferation, and separation of Kupffer cells so that these are converted into large free phagocytes which may possess one or several nuclei. These are the gigantic macrophages of chronically stained animals. In all our experiments we have used only acutely stained animals, so that the effects of the dye itself are never sufficient to produce the changes. In fact there is no evidence that the dye accentuates the changes appreciably during the time involved in the experiment. The dye, however, shows us the type of the cells entering into the tuberculous granuloma, for when fed to the body fluids in abundance trypan blue finds its way into all cells capable of receiving it. The vital stain is, as it were, a physiological test for the cells. Whatever the fundamental nature of the vital stain produced by trypan blue and the benzidine dyes may be, it is important that this reaction does not occur to any appreciable extent with mononuclear blood cells, and that it does occur emphatically in the case of the hepatic endothelium. By means of this vital test, then, the following phenomena occur when suspensions of tubercle bacilli are let into the portal blood stream. The organisms, swept on by the blood stream, finally lodge in the terminal branches of the portal vein, where they plug the vessels and continue to multiply. They injure the vessel wall and cause around them an exudative inflammatory process, and finally lead to the formation of tubercles situated not only in these areas but also within the liver lobule. The injury to the vessel wall is manifested in the early stages by the presence of vitally stained areas in its structure. The bacteria at the end of half an hour are found to be extracellular in clumps in the larger vessels, but already to some extent in the bodies of vitally stained Kupffer cells throughout the liver. Exudative inflammation manifests itself by the presence of a transitory accumulation of polynuclear leucocytes about the bacterial clumps, which may be seen as early as half an hour after the inoculation. They continue to be present in the larger cell clumps of the periportal areas for many days, but they are rapidly replaced by other cells, mononuclear in type, so that within a day the histological appearance of the portal plug has changed radically. The mononuclear cell thus entering most actively into the reaction is endothelial and not hematogenous in origin, the vital stain enabling us to make a clear distinction. This fact, evident in the portal plugs, is decisively shown in the case of tubercles developing within the liver lobule. Such tubercles probably result from the localization of individual organisms within the Kupffer cells, for the initial stages of such a probable cycle have been found by us. They consist of the occurrence of mitoses in certain Kupffer cells where the Ziehl-Nielson method shows a bacillus or several bacilli to have been phagocytized (figure 4). Rapid growth of the infected cell now takes place, and at thirty-six hours the multinucleated giant cell produced is largely separated from the other endothelium of the vessel wall. Many bacilli exist within the protoplasm of these cells (figure 5), which are especially distinguishable by their intense reaction to the vital stain. They have received trypan blue to such an excess that low power views of liver sections at the thirty-six hour stage show these cells as deep blue spots (figure 8). The origin of the giant cell from the Kupffer cell is evident not only from the above sequence and from the elective stain, but also from the fact that even when fully formed, protoplasmic strands still join it to its mother tissue,-the normal endothelium of the vessel. The strands entangle other cells in their meshes, especially mononuclear blood cells, one of which, of the polyblastic type, has homogeneous protoplasm and is not infrequently encountered in mitosis. These cells are unquestionably of importance in the lesion of tuberculosis. We have seen them abundantly in the capillaries soon after the inoculation and they also occur singly or in nests between the Kupffer cells and liver columns. They are, as a rule, free from the vital dye. They continue to be concerned in the further growth of the tubercle and with the connective tissue cells make the structure of older tubercles relatively complex. On the other hand, little complexity occurs in the structure of the young intralobular masses. The miliary tubercle formed at the end of thirty-six hours is composed of a giant cell, surrounded by epithelioid cells and by blood cells of the above polyblastic type. The giant cell and its so called epithelioid cells are electively stained and are exclusively derived from the hepatic endothelium.
1. The action of indophenoloxydase is generally diminished in the tissues (liver, renal cortex, heart muscle) of rabbits that die of pneumococcus septicemia. The diminution is more frequent and marked in the liver and kidney than in the heart muscle. 2. The diminished activity of indophenoloxydase becomes more evident when the tissues undergo autolysis. At 37 degrees C. this ferment is much more easily destroyed in the tissues of the infected animals than in those from normal control animals (tables I, II, III, and IV). Exceptions are rare and they occur chiefly with the heart muscle. 3. Normal rabbit tissues, inoculated in vitro with pneumococcus culture, do not lose their indophenoloxydase much more quickly than do the normal controls, when they are kept either at room temperature or at 37 degrees C. (tables IV, V, VI, and VII). 4. It is therefore probable that the diminished activity of the indophenoloxydase of tissues from rabbits with pneumococcus septicemia is not due to the presence of the pneumococcus in these tissues, but that it is associated with a pathological change in the animal cell during life.
Liver.-The amount of filterable nitrogen in the samples before autolysis is too variable, both in the normal livers and in the livers from pneumococcus infections in the rabbit, for a constant difference to be obtained. The amino nitrogen before autolysis is generally slightly increased in the livers of the infected animals, especially in the perfused specimens. Most of the experiments show an increased disintegration of the livers of the infected animals during the first stages of proteolysis (twenty to thirty hours), both in the non-perfused and the perfused specimens. This increased disintegration is generally more evident for the complex proteins (filterable nitrogen) than for the lower products (amino nitrogen). In the later stages the proteolysis of the blood-containing livers of the normal and the infected rabbits tends to an equalization, or the relations reverse, the proteolysis of the normal samples becoming more advanced. In the perfused specimens the differences in the rate of proteolysis are the same as in the earlier stages. Kidney.-The rate of proteolysis shows no constant differences in the normal and infected tissues.
It has been shown that white rats may survive complete extirpation of the thymus for at least 131 days, even when the operation is performed within the first two weeks of life. Removal of the thymus does not produce an arrest or retardation of body growth and development. Qualitative changes in the skeletal system or teeth have not been found. In emaciated, weak animals osteogenesis is less active than in healthy rats, and the long bones are smaller and more delicate in structure. Such quantitative differences appear to depend upon the general nutrition, are equally pronounced in rats whose development is retarded from other causes, and cannot be referred specifically to loss of thymus function. No constant or characteristic alterations were detected in the spleen, testes, adrenals, or thyroid. Whatever functional correlations may exist between thymus and any or all of these organs are not evident from the occurrence of histological changes after the removal of the thymus. The relative proportion of lymphocytes in the blood is diminished for the first few weeks after the operation. We have not determined how long this alteration in the leucocytic formula persists. Since this paper went to press an article has appeared by Klose, describing briefly the results of thymus extirpation in pigs, goats, rats, and chickens. In rats thymectomized on the fourteenth day, there followed a progressive cachexia terminating in death after eight to ten weeks. Disturbances in ossification, which macroscopically and microscopically were identical with those of human rickets, developed also in the ribs and long bones. Some of Klose's litters failed to show these lesions, and this negative result is explained as having been due to the presence of thymic tissue within the thyroid gland. The observations of Klose are in direct contradiction to the negative results described in this paper. Since the possible presence of accessory thymus tissue either within the thyroid or elsewhere was carefully excluded in my experiments, the discrepancy between my findings and those of Klose cannot be explained upon this basis. Since this paper was sent to the publisher I have studied two additional rats which were killed 185 days after operation. Minute examination of a complete series of the neck organs, including the thyroid, failed to show any tissue which could be interpreted as thymus. The bones showed no rachitic changes. The infective origin of rachitic and osteomalacic lesions in rats has been established by Morpurgo. Although reference is made by Klose to Morpurgo's work, the data given by him do not enable one to judge whether this infection was definitely excluded.
Our experiments show that the albumen fraction, or end-piece, obtained by the dialysis of normal guinea pig serum possesses definite opsonic action. This action is often almost equal to that residing in the unfractionated alexin. It is evident, however, only if the reaction maintained during the experiments approximates that of the original serum. By the addition of small quantities of a weak sodium hydrate solution to the dialyzed serum we have been able to bring back opsonic action which was not evident in the same end-piece if simply rendered isotonic. Although our attention was called to the question of reaction by the work of Bronfenbrenner and Noguchi, like Liefmann, we have been unable to reactivate the hemolytic function of end-piece by alteration of reaction. Our experiments suggest that the opsonic action of the albumen fraction is enhanced by preliminary sensitization of the bacteria with heated normal serum and by persensitization of such bacteria with the globulin fraction. However, we cannot be positive of this, since the slight differences of phagocytic counts upon which such an opinion can be based, fall within the limits of what we consider our experimental error. The fact that the albumen fraction can exert opsonic activity upon bacteria but cannot hemolyze blood cells seems to us particularly interesting in the light of the fact that alexin can be absorbed by unsensitized bacteria but not by similarly untreated blood cells. The literature upon the relation of the alexin fractions to bacteria and the bactericidal effect is confusing in that contradictory results have been obtained by other workers. We are studying this phase of the problem with particular attention to the alkalinity or acidity under which the reactions are carried out. We think that our experiments do not point to a differentiation of normal opsonin from alexin, but we believe they indicate that the so called end-piece can enter to a slight extent into non-specific relationship with unsensitized bacteria, and it is therefore active, whereas it cannot enter into a similar relation to unsensitized cells. This conception, however, is tentatively made, since we are studying further the non-specific absorption of alexin or complement by unsensitized bacteria.
A strain of Spirochoeta pallida isolated from the nervous system has shown the following constant characters: (1) thick form; (2) the production of hard, well demarcated lesions with necrotic centers; (3) a characteristic location of the lesion; (4) a short incubation period; (5) a tendency to generalize with lesions of the skin and eye, following local inoculation of the testicle and scrotum. It is suggested that these characters constitute a definite strain of highly invasive power and that a classification of members of the pallida group may be made in accordance with this power.
Nitrous oxide, administered by means of the Gatch apparatus, as a preliminary anesthetic to ether has been found to be superior for the dog in rapidity of action, in promotion of ease of handling, and in absence of disorder; the anesthesia may be maintained solely by nitrous oxide in combination with oxygen; it is economical; and its use is instructive to students from closer imitation of current surgical methods.
1. Caseous matter obtained from lymph glands which have not become secondarily infected contains substances which inhibit enzyme activity. These substances consist chiefly of soaps of the unsaturated fatty acids. 2. The inhibiting substances are present in relatively smaller amounts when the caseous matter has become secondarily infected. This is probably due to the dilution and washing out of the soaps. 3. Ferments are either entirely absent or present in very small amounts, unless the caseous matter has become secondarily infected. 4. Caseous material from the lungs contains smaller amounts of the inhibiting substances. This may be due to the acuteness of the process, which does not permit an accumulation of the soaps, or to the binding of the soaps with the ferments. 5. Ferments are present in caseous pneumonia. In the whole emulsion the ferments are less active in an alkaline than in an acid reaction; but removal of the soaps shows that those active in an alkaline reaction are also present in considerable amounts. 6. The previous treatment with iodin of caseous matter from both lymph glands and lungs increases the action of the trypsin.
1. Dilution of plasma with isotonic solutions causes a more extensive migration in cultures of cells of the actively migratory type, such as those of spleen and bone marrow. Dilution with a limited quantity of distilled water produces the same effect. Less actively motile cells are influenced little or not at all by dilution. The effect on cells of the first type is probably due to the reduction in the quantity of fibrin in the clot producing lessened resistance to cell locomotion. 2. Dilution of plasma with either isotonic solutions or distilled water is without effect on cell multiplication, as is shown by records of the number of mitoses in living culture preparations. 3. Dilution of plasma with suitable quantities of Ringer's solution causes a marked diminution in the quantity of fat accumulated by the cells. This reduction is to be attributed to the decrease in the quantity of fat in the medium. The accumulation of fat by cells in cultures is therefore not to be regarded as the result of a cell degeneration, but as an accumulation, the source of the fat being the medium in which the cells are growing.
1. Some strains of Trypanosoma lewisi may, at times, produce rapidly fatal infections in a large percentage of the rats infected. 2. In such strains of Trypanosoma lewisi, a sufficient degree of pathogenicity may persist to warrant the designation of these strains as pathogenic. 3. The pathogenicity of a given strain of Trypanosoma lewisi is not constant, but is subject to marked and even sudden variations.
The virus of poliomyelitis introduced into the blood may pass indirectly by way of the cerebrospinal fluid to the interstices of the central nervous organs. To reach the cerebrospinal fluid the virus must first penetrate the barrier of the choroid plexus, which operation requires time. By the inoculation test, no virus was detected in the fluid at the expiration of 48 hours, only small amounts at the expiration of 72 hours, while at the expiration of 96 hours the virus had passed more freely. The virus was still detectable in the fluid at the onset of paralysis 19 days after the intravenous injection. Pathological conditions of the leptomeninges and the cerebrospinal fluid play an important part in the pathogenesis of epidemic poliomyelitis.
1. In rheumatic myocarditis, foci, termed submiliary nodules of Aschoff, are present which are characteristic of the rheumatic infection. 2. They are most frequently found in the walls of the left ventricle, the auricles usually escaping. 3. The nodules were found in three cases of chorea without joint manifestations, proving the close relation of this condition to rheumatism. 4. They were absent in fourteen cases of subacute bacterial endocarditis due to Streptococcus mitis. 5. They were not found in infections of the endocardium with the gonococcus, staphylococcus, streptococcus, or pneumococcus. 6. Even in the absence of a rheumatic history we believe, in accordance with Fraenkel, that the presence of Aschoff bodies signifies a previous rheumatic infection. 7. Aschoff bodies are not always found in rheumatic carditis, where the infection antedates death by a long period, but the healed remains, represented by sclerotic patches ("Schwielen"), are present. 8. We suggest that the cases of arthritis characterized by the presence of the submiliary nodules of Aschoff in the myocardium be placed in one group and called for the time being "rheumatism"; and the cases with articular manifestations, yielding positive bacteriological findings and no Aschoff bodies, should be classified according to the infecting microörganisms concerned, and not as rheumatism.
1. By the intravenous injection into rabbits of Streptococcus mitis, we have produced focalized myocardial lesions which are identical with those caused by the injection of Streptococcus rheumaticus, and with those produced by Bracht and Wächter with Streptococcus viridans. 2. The lesions differ from those which we produced by injections of streptococci from the Chicago epidemic of sore throat (epidemic streptococcus). 3. The lesions are not identical with Aschoff bodies and are easily differentiated from them. They also differ from the foci produced by Jackson and Coombs, who describe their lesions as being either Aschoff bodies or similar formations. 4. The myocardial lesions of the rabbit appear to be caused by toxins liberated by the streptococci injected and not by the living organisms themselves. 5. The only point of similarity between the experimental lesions and those found in cases of rheumatic carditis in man is their focalized nature.
1. We have produced arthritis in 50 per cent. of the rabbits injected with Streptococcus mitis. 2. The character of the arthritis is identical with that produced by Micrococcus rheumaticus. 3. The exudate in and about the joints partakes of the same nature as that caused by Streptococcus rheumaticus. 4. Bacteriological studies show that Streptococcus mitis can be recovered from about one third of the affected joints. 5. Arthritis produced by other types of streptococci differs by reason of greater destruction of tissue, by being more permanent in character, and by the exudate containing large numbers of polymorphonuclear leucocytes. 6. The deduction of a distinct variety or species of streptococcus based upon the power to cause arthritis in rabbits is unwarranted.
1. What appear to be certain definite stages in the migration of the malarial parasite from red corpuscle to red corpuscle may be demonstrated by thorough and persistent observations,-not minutes spent on each specimen, but many hours. 2. The migration of the malarial parasite from red corpuscle to red corpuscle gives a reasonable explanation of the loss of red corpuscles which cannot be accounted for by the destruction of the infected corpuscles at the time the parasites segment. 3. Migration to other red corpuscles is a satisfactory explanation of the ultimate fate of the young parasites seen in instances of multiple infection of single corpuscles. 4. In the light of the facts here presented, it would seem impossible to explain the instances of the parasites partly on and partly off degenerated red corpuscles as the result of technique. A stage in the migration of the parasite seems to me to be the probable interpretation of the phenomenon. 5. A corpuscular mound encircled by an adult parasite, when seen at the periphery of the red corpuscle, should have the same significance and interpretation in reference to the extracellular relation of the parasite to the corpuscle, that it has when it is seen in connection with a young parasite. 6. The adult ring-form parasite should have the same interpretation as the young ring-form parasite. 7. Attachment to the external surface of the red corpuscles seems to me to be the only possible interpretation of the appearances of the parasites pictured in this article.
1. The ferment-inhibiting action of the serum is due to the presence of compounds of the unsaturated fatty acids. 2. These fatty acid compounds may be removed from the serum by means of chloroform or ether. 3. Soaps prepared by saponifying the chloroform or ether extracts inhibit the action of trypsin. 4. The anti-enzyme action of the serum can be removed by filtering acid serum through kaolin, and can in part be restored by extracting the kaolin. 5. The decrease in strength of anti-enzyme in old sera is probably due to the action of the serum lipase. 6. Iodin, potassium iodide, or hydrogen peroxide remove the inhibiting action of the serum. 7. Soaps of the unsaturated fatty acids lose their ferment-inhibiting action when heated with serum at 70 degrees C.
1. Sera from which the protective lipoids (unsaturated fatty acids) have been removed are toxic for the homologous animal. 2. The toxicity is due to three factors: (a) an alteration in the mechanism of coagulation, with resulting intravascular coagulation; (b) the exposure of the native serum proteins; (c) the formation of toxic split products (primary proteoses) by autolysis. 3. A definite maximum of toxicity can be determined, with a final stage of atoxicity due to continued autolysis. 4. Hirudin and sodium citrate do not protect animals. 5. Heating to 70 degrees C. destroys, or greatly lessens, the toxicity of the serotoxin, although the isolated proteoses are toxic after boiling. 6. The return of the extracted lipoids (saponified) neutralizes the toxicity. 7. Unsaturated soaps also neutralize the toxicity. 8. Sublethal doses produce extreme prostration, marked fall in body temperature, no eosinophilia, and an increase of antitrypsin. 9. Sublethal doses of rapidly prepared chloroform sera cause a decrease in coagulation time; sublethal doses of autolyzed sera cause an increase in coagulation time. 10. Previously injected animals are more resistant (increased antiferments). 11. Iodized animals are less resistant (decreased antiferments).
Several green dyes show a marked selective action for members of the typhoid-paratyphoid-colon group. This can be used for the enrichment of typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli present in feces. Forty dyes were tested with thirty strains covering all types of pathogenic bacteria. In general the dyes restrained the growth of the Gram-positive bacteria but had no effect on the growth of the Gram-negative group.
It has been shown that the chick embryo offers suitable conditions for the growth of implanted tissues, whether these be embryonic or adult, of the same species or a foreign one. The chick at about the time of hatching develops a defensive mechanism against the tissue of foreign species. This resistance can be supplied to the embryo in the early stages if grafts of adult spleen or bone marrow are implanted. Under these conditions the embryo exhibits the same resistance to foreign tissue as does the adult, and presents the same histological manifestations about the graft. Furthermore, the same tissues, spleen and bone marrow, when grafted into an embryo with an established and growing rat tumor, bring about a retrogression and absorption of the foreign tissue. Other adult tissues do not supply this power to the embryo.
1. The malarial parasite is extracellular throughout its life cycle and migrates from red corpuscle to red corpuscle destroying each before it abandons it; in the brief intervals between, the parasite is free in the blood serum; it does not remain long free, but almost immediately attaches itself to another red corpuscle by means of delicate pseudopodia. 2. The compact form of the tertian parasite is the type of free parasite most often observed; in this form the parasite may be seen not only in migration, but after quinine and in the cadaver. I believe the compact form to be the normal resting form of the parasite, all other forms being assumed in order to secure attachment and to obtain food. 3. Care must be taken not to confound free parasites having protoplasmic pseudopodia ready for attachment with the sexual flagellating parasites, whose flagella are composed of chromatin. 4. The malarial parasite can live for some time free in the blood serum, though under normal conditions there is no reason why it should remain free for any length of time, and there are certain periods in the life of the parasite when it must be admitted that it is free from the corpuscle and survives. If the parasite is, as I believe, attached to the external surface of the red corpuscle, it is constantly exposed to the action of the patients' serum. 5. The destruction of more than one red corpuscle by each parasite would readily account for the severe and early anemia occurring in malarial infections. 6. Long continued treatment with quinine will eventually cause the death of all malarial parasites.
The adrenalin index as used in this paper means the amount of adrenalin in milligrams per gram of gland. As in our hands the chemical colorimetric method has proved more accurate, these values rather than the physiological values will be given in the final analysis. The two adrenal glands in the same individual as a rule contain about the same amount of adrenalin per gram, but variations of 10 to 20 per cent. are not unusual. Normal dogs show an index which may vary from 1.2 to 1.8 milligrams. The dogs were killed by short ether anesthesia and bleeding from the carotid. Normal human beings, dying from trauma, rupture of aneurysm, etc., show an index of 0.35 to 0.50 of a milligram, when autopsy takes place a few hours after death. Deterioration of uncut glands or of a gland hash kept on ice in the dark is not rapid and rarely exceeds 10 per cent. in twenty-four hours. Acute intoxication in dogs shows a low adrenalin index, especially the intoxication associated with intestinal obstruction and the closed intestinal loop. Intravenous injection of the poison found in closed duodenal loops sufficient to cause fatal shock causes a great drop in the adrenalin index, at times to one fourth normal or even lower. After recovery from a sublethal toxic dose the adrenalin index may rise rapidly to a point considerably above normal. The same may hold for recovery after chloroform poisoning. Anesthesia by chloroform or ether causes a drop in the adrenalin index depending upon the length of anesthesia and probably in part on the depth of anesthesia. Liver poisons (chloroform, phosphorus, hydrazine) cause a drop in the adrenal index to a low level, perhaps one half normal in acute cases. Pancreas extirpation with prolonged glycosuria and death produces a great drop in the adrenalin index (cat). There is evidence that this may hold in some cases of human diabetes. In man disease of one adrenal (tuberculosis) may be associated with an adrenalin index of double the normal value in the intact adrenal. Pernicious anemia is the only disease so far found to present an abnormally high adrenalin index, and the single case shows an index at least twice normal. This is of interest especially in relation to the views recently put forward to indicate that the spleen and adrenal may be concerned in the lipoid metabolism which is thought to be profoundly disturbed in this disease. Secondary anemia due to repeated hemorrhage or the intoxication of cancer or tuberculosis causes a fall in the adrenalin index. Cachexia due to neoplasm or tuberculosis may cause a marked fall in the adrenalin index, perhaps to less than one half of normal. Acute infections (typhoid fever), septicemia, peritonitis, and similar conditions may be associated with a normal adrenalin index or one somewhat below normal. Diseases of the kidneys, heart, or blood vessels associated with elevated blood pressure show no constant variation in the adrenalin index, which may be normal or slightly subnormal.
Ovarian infection and germinal transmission of disease have been conclusively demonstrated in our investigations of bacillary white diarrhea in the common domestic fowl. The disease, which has caused so much loss to the poultry industry in recent years, primarily affects young chicks that are but a few weeks old. Chicks which survive frequently become permanent bacillus carriers, the ovary being the important seat of infection. The eggs from such carriers often harbor the organism of the disease in the yolk. Chicks that develop in infected eggs become in turn infected, and have the disease at the time of hatching. The disease is transmitted to normal chicks through the infected droppings; thus an epidemic is produced, and the cycle of infection is completed. There is no evidence to indicate that germinal transmission through the male takes place. In view of the frequent negative results bearing on this question it seems probable that it does not.
1. The morphological and developmental anomalies of a pathogenic strain of Trypanosoma lewisi have been described to show the unusual character of the strain. 2. Especial attention is called to the spontaneous occurrence of ablepharoplastic forms of Trypanosoma lewisi. 3. It is pointed out that morphological anomalies were most pronounced in infections that showed unusual conditions of multiplication, and that such infections usually proved severe. 4. Finally, an appreciable correlation between the morphological and developmental characteristics and the virulence as manifested in these examples of infection with Trypanosoma lewisi has been suggested.
Two spontaneous chicken tumors, unlike in several important respects, have given rise on transplantation to neoplasms of identical character. The spontaneous growth, No. 18, situated in the gizzard, was a spindle-celled sarcoma rifted with blood sinuses into which it extended, with result in what may be described as an intracanalicular pattern. The metastases, which were in the voluntary muscles, showed the same peculiar structure. Tumor 38, occurring in the subcutaneous tissue of the groin, was a solid, spindle-celled sarcoma of rather close texture, with few blood vessels. Here and there were small areas of softening, and at its center was a large degeneration cyst with ragged walls, containing a clear fluid. There were no metastases. The transplantation tumors from both growths have been characterized by slow growth, tendency to metastasize to the skeletal muscles without involvement of the lungs, and a structure which at one time is that of a very regular spindle-celled sarcoma containing many bands and ribbons of collagen, and at another that of a sarcoma rifted with blood sinuses like the spontaneous tumor No. 18. At present the two strains are practically indistinguishable in appearance and general behavior. Both are caused by filterable agents. The agent causing No. 38, unlike that causing No. 18, retains its activity in tumor tissue which has been dried or glycerinated; and in a Berkefeld filtrate it is much the more active in causing tumors. These differences can hardly be thought of as constituting a fundamental distinction between agents which, to judge from their effects, are almost undoubtedly different strains of a single disease cause. That chicken tumors of markedly different type have different filterable agents as their cause has been proved by experiments already reported. The present findings make it probable that, within certain limits, tumors of rather various character may be dependent upon a single agent. This assumption greatly simplifies the etiological problem. But the truth of the assumption for other instances than those described in the present article can only be determined by the study and comparison in many hosts of the disease-complexes of which each spontaneous chicken tumor is to be considered as an individual expression.
The forty-third spontaneous chicken tumor received at this laboratory strikingly resembles the first and has given rise on transplantation to an entirely similar series of neoplasms. Tumors of both strains are due to a filterable agent which remains active in the dried or glycerinated tissue.
Cholera-like non-agglutinating vibrios are invariably found in the intestinal contents of healthy persons, and frequently in the water of wells and rivers, during epidemics of cholera. Although many of these saprophytic vibrios are indistinguishable in morphology and cultural properties from the cholera vibrio, the negative reaction with an anticholera serum has readily differentiated them from the Asiatic vibrio. The biological polymorphism of the cholera vibrio has been suggested by the development of agglutination, by special methods of culture, in cholera-like vibrios. Confirmatory Pfeiffer reactions have not been obtained, as a rule, in these instances, probably because of the low virulence of the vibrio culture, although positive bacteriolysis in vitro (Bordet's test) was observed in some, and in others positive complement fixation and cross agglutination indicated the cholera nature of the vibrios in question. Although it cannot as yet be definitely proven, we are justified in suspecting that cholera-like vibrios which eventually develop agglutination properties are of a true cholera nature. It is probable that the production of agglutination antibodies in the serum brings about the development by the bacterial cell of defensive anti-agglutinins, resulting in the disappearance of agglutinating power. In the case of the water vibrios, changed physical conditions could bring about a similar alteration in biological properties. It may be said that the absence of agglutination in a vibrio isolated from a suspected source does not define conclusively its noncholera nature. In all probability among a number of cholera-like vibrios isolated from suspected sources a certain percentage will eventually be found to develop agglutination either during laboratory cultivation or by means of animal passage, and until subjected to a procedure that will induce the return of agglutination no vibrio can be regarded with assurance as of a truly saprophytic variety.
A strain of human connective tissue was kept in a condition of active life in vitro for more than two months. When a medium has been devised the composition of which is more constant, it is reasonable to suppose that human connective tissue can be cultivated in vitro for an indefinite period.
The parameningococci of Dopter are culturally indistinguishable from true or normal meningococci, but serologically they exhibit differences as regards agglutination, opsonization, and complement deviation. Because of the variations and irregularities of serum reactions existing among otherwise normal strains of meningococci it does not seem either possible or desirable to separate the parameningococci into a strictly definite class. It appears desirable to consider them as constituting a special strain among meningococci not, however, wholly consistent in itself. The distinctions in serum reactions between normal and para meningococci are supported by the differences in protective effects of the monovalent immune sera upon infection in guinea pigs and monkeys. It is therefore concluded that it is highly desirable to employ strains of parameningococcus in the preparation of the usual polyvalent antimeningococcic serum. It remains to be determined whether it is better to employ the parameningococci along with normal meningococci in immunizing horses, or to employ normal and para strains separately in the immunization process and to combine afterwards, in certain proportions, the sera from the two kinds of immunized horses.
A distinct retention of calcium, magnesium, and phosphorus was noted, which was not accompanied by corresponding changes in general metabolism, as evidenced by a practical balance of nitrogen and sulphur. It is concluded that there is a primary disturbance in the metabolism of the mineral elements mentioned, with the probable formation of new bony tissue. The distribution of elements between urine and feces shows no abnormal variations. A suggestion is made as to the reasons for variable calcium output in the urine on a uniform diet.
The metabolism of calcium was studied in a man after complete removal of the thyroid and parathyroid glands. A slight retention of calcium (0.4578 of a gram of calcium oxide in the ten-day period) was noted. The urinary calcium excretion was low, averaging 0.0134 of a gram per day on a daily ingestion averaging 1.6736 grams of calcium oxide. A slight increase was observed during the period of study in the calcium content of the blood. No symptoms of tetany were noted in the patient, who survived operation thirty-nine days. The low urinary and blood calcium values are taken to show deficient absorption of calcium, which may bear some relation to the decreased gastric secretion after parathyroidectomy. Attempts are made to explain the non-occurrence of tetany as due to the high calcium intake and to the development of a compensatory mechanism in which the pituitary body may play a part.
When rabbits are injected intravenously with a quantity of virulent streptococci or pneumococci sufficient to cause death within two to four days the septicemia takes a definite course with slight variations. The bacteria rapidly decrease in number from the time of the injection to from two to four hours, at which time the blood is sterile or contains only a few bacteria. Within five to six hours the bacteria reappear in the blood and steadily increase until the death of the animal. If the bacteria are less virulent, the same quantity of culture causes a chronic type of infection. The same initial decrease in the number of bacteria occurs. The reëntrance into the blood is somewhat delayed, the septicemia does not reach the height obtained in the acute cases, and a second fall occurs within the course of a few hours. These rabbits show a low blood invasion or a sterile blood culture for several days. During this time they become emaciated to a marked degree. Then the low septicemia rapidly rises or the rabbit with a sterile culture develops a severe septicemia within a few hours and death takes place from a few hours to two days thereafter. In this type of infection local lesions, pericarditis, pleurisy, peritonitis, etc., are usually found. In the infections which run an acute course no gross lesions are found. If the bacteria are still less virulent they never reënter the blood after the initial disappearance and the rabbits remain in good condition. In order to obtain uniform results, the quantity of bacteria injected must not be so large that the bacterial substances See PDF for Structure carried in are sufficient to cause an intoxication of the animal. If the quantity of bacteria injected is below this point the course of the infection depends largely upon the virulence of the infecting organisms. Yet variations in the natural resistance of individual animals may be sufficient to cause quite marked irregularities in the course of the infection. Pneumococci can be standardized so as to produce a particular type of infection more easily than streptococci. In general infections such as those produced by streptococci and pneumococci the number of the bacteria present in the circulating blood at a given time supplies accurate and delicate information regarding the severity of the disease. When the object is to determine the degree of virulence of bacteria, or of the efficiency of an experimental therapeutic method, the mere physical condition and mere death of the inoculated animals are not sufficient and satisfactory guides to the desired information. The death of the inoculated animal and the recovery of the infecting bacteria at autopsy do not give complete information concerning the intensity and course of the infection occurring during life. A large number of bacteria found in the blood and tissues at autopsy do not necessarily prove the existence of a heavy infection before the onset of the death agony, since it is a well known fact that bacteria multiply with enormous rapidity, once the natural resistance of the animal has been overcome. Therefore, if merely the life and death of the animal and autopsy findings must serve as our only guides, we shall lose much incidental information, perhaps of fundamental value. This may be especially true as regards the search for curative substances. Again, the individual animals of the same species, age, and apparently of identical physical condition react to the aggressive force of the infecting organisms variously. This fact is readily found out by the injection of a series of rabbits with lethal quantities of bacteria per body-weight, and by making tests at various periods before death results, which, in the case of streptococci, ranges from one to six days. Consequently a method which enables the determination of the degree and progress of the infection at any desired period is of obvious advantage.
The virus of poliomyelitis is capable of penetrating the retina without producing apparent injury, to reach the central nervous organs. The virus injected into the blood is deposited promptly in the spleen and bone marrow, but not in the kidneys, spinal cord, or brain. Notwithstanding the affinity which the nervous tissues possess for the virus, it is not removed from the blood by the spinal cord and brain until the choroid plexus and blood vessels have suffered injury. The intervertebral ganglia remove the virus from the blood earlier than do the spinal cord and brain. An aseptic inflammation produced by an intraspinous injection of horse serum facilitates and insures the passage of the virus to the central nervous organs, and the production of paralysis. The unaided virus, even when present in large amounts, passes inconstantly from the blood to the substance of the spinal cord and brain. When the virus within the blood fails to gain access to the central nervous organs, and to set up paralysis, it is destroyed by the body, in course of which destruction it undergoes, as a result of the action of the spleen and, perhaps, other organs, diminution of virulence. The histological lesions that follow the intravenous injections of the virus in some but not in all cases differ from those which result from intraneural modes of infection. In escaping from the blood into the spinal cord and brain, the virus causes a lymphatic invasion of the choroid plexus and widespread perivascular infiltration, and from the latter cellular invasions enter the nervous tissues. A similar lymphoid infiltration of the choroid plexus may arise also from an intracerebral injection of the virus. The histological lesions present in the central nervous organs in human cases of poliomyelitis correspond to those that arise from the intraneural method of infection in the monkey. The virus in transit from the blood through the cerebrospinal fluid to the substance of the spinal cord and brain is capable of being neutralized by intraspinous injection of immune serum, whereby the production of paralysis is averted. Carmin in a sterile and finely divided state introduced into the meninges and ventricles sets up an aseptic inflammation, but is quickly taken up by cells, including ependymal cells. When an aseptic inflammation has been previously established by means of horse serum, or when the nervous tissues are already injured by the poliomyelitic virus, the pigment appears to enter the ependymal cells more freely. The experiments described support the view that infection in epidemic poliomyelitis in man is local and neural, and by way of the lymphatics, and not general and by way of the blood. Hence they uphold the belief that the infection atrium is the upper respiratory mucous membrane.
The rise of temperature following typhoid vaccination is accompanied by a marked increase in the output of total nitrogen, creatinin, and especially of uric acid. The reaction to tuberculin is slower, but is also accompanied by an increased output of nitrogenous substances, that is, however, less uniform and generally less pronounced. In a case of malaria there was a tendency for the rise of temperature to be accompanied by an increased output of total nitrogen and less uniformly of creatinin; on two days on which the fever was preceded by rigor the output of uric acid was increased.
When phenoltetrachlorphthalein is injected intravenously, it is eliminated from the body in the bile through the activity of the hepatic epithelium. The feces may be collected after purgation and the phthalein extracted and estimated against a standard solution. The estimation of phthalein can be done with accuracy in a suitable colorimeter and the elimination in normal dogs is quite constant. Given a definite liver injury by means of poisons (chloroform, phosphorus), the amount of phthalein excreted will be diminished and the fall in output will be proportional to the amount of injury. With an acute fatal poisoning the curve may fall to zero. Under certain conditions of vascular interference the liver phthalein may show a decreased output; in passive congestion of the liver and with the Eck fistula the liver output may fall considerably below normal. Known disturbances of the liver function due to parenchymatous injury or vascular disturbances are indicated by a fall in the phthalein. excretion curve. Conversely it may be claimed that a drop in phthalein excretion may indicate a decrease in the functional capacity of the liver even if there be no detectable histological changes. Adrenal insufficiency produced by extirpation of three fourths or more of the gland tissue will be associated with a drop in liver phthalein excretion. With hypertrophy of the adrenal fragment the excretion comes back to normal, but may fall again when more adrenal tissue is removed (text-figure 1). Pancreatic insufficiency causes a progressive fall in the phthalein excretion indicating a grave lowering of the functional capacity of the liver (text-figure 2). This fact has a direct bearing on the question of diabetes. Parathyroid insufficiency with tetany causes no decrease in phthalein output, but at times a rise above normal. This comes out best when the phthalein curve is low following pancreas extirpation. Parathyroid tetany may cause hyperactivity on the part of the liver cells. Thyroid insufficiency produces no change in the uniform curve of phthalein excretion. Hypophysis insufficiency shows an initial fall in the curve, followed by a return to normal and a final drop in the last few days before death. These experiments supply evidence to the effect that the liver is very much concerned in the derangement that follows the removal of the ductless glands. Hence it seems probable that this disturbance of the liver function may be an important factor in the general symptom complex of ductless gland insufficiency. In conclusion we wish to express our appreciation to Dr. S. J. Crowe and Dr. A. P. Jones for assistance rendered in performing some of the operations for gland removal.
1. There is no demonstrable increase in non-coagulable nitrogen during bacteriolysis. 2. Bacteria treated with immune serum and complement are so altered that they are more readily digested by trypsin. 3. Bacteria treated with complement alone become more resistant to proteolysis. 4. Bacteria treated with an excess of immune serum and complement become more resistant to proteolysis.
A comparison of the results obtained in the analysis of the different effusions shows that they vary, (1) according to location, and (2) according to the disease in which they are produced. Thus the subcutaneous effusions are totally different in their composition from the abdominal or pleuritic fluids; and again the abdominal fluid of nephritic origin is different from those of cardiac or other origin. The cutaneous effusions are characterized by a very low protein content and a small amount of incoagulable nitrogen. Of the protein present in these fluids, the globulin constitutes the greater portion. In the mixed cardionephritic fluids the ratio of globulin to albumin is lower than that in normal blood serum; but when compared with the blood sera of cardionephritic cases there appears to be a certain parallelism. The chloride content of these fluids is considerably above that found in normal blood serum, but is comparable with those of corresponding cases. The effusions occurring in serous cavities differ from the cutaneous ones by their higher protein content. The highest values are attained in the pleural fluids, in which the protein present is almost the same as that in normal blood serum. The incoagulable nitrogen in these fluids is uniformly low. The chlorides vary in amount according to the nature of the case. In the effusions of inflammatory origin the values are lower than those found in the blood. In the pleural fluids of other than inflammatory origin the chloride content is either the same or higher than that of blood serum. The globulin-albumin ratio in all of these fluids except one (table III, fluid 61) is higher than that of normal blood serum. Otherwise the highest value is presented by a pleural fluid from a case of nephritis (table III, fluid 205) and the lowest by an empyema fluid (table III, fluid 30). The latter case is of especial interest because of the theory, first propounded by Schmidt, that the leucocytes in the purulent fluid are largely responsible for high globulin content. The abdominal fluids in general are less rich in protein than the pleural effusions. Those of cardiac origin give the highest protein values, but the globulin-albumin ratios are lower than in the pleural fluids or in the blood sera of corresponding cases. Only in two fluids does the globulin reach a percentage of 62 and 52.2. In both these cases the chloride content is also high. The incoagulable nitrogen in all of them is rather low. In one fluid of purely nephritic origin the protein content is low and all of it is globulin. This is suggestive, when compared with the values obtained in the analysis of the blood sera from nephritic cases. The results obtained in the analysis of abdominal fluids from cardionephritic cases approach very closely those obtained in purely cardiac cases.
Solutions of the bodies of pneumococci, obtained by dissolving them in dilute solutions of sodium cholate, by permitting them to undergo autolysis, or by first freezing, drying, and then grinding in salt solution, are actively hemolytic for rabbit, sheep, guinea pig, and human red blood corpuscles. The substance on which this hemolytic property depends is very labile, much of its activity is lost on passing through a filter, and it is destroyed by the action of trypsin. In its properties it corresponds to the substance contained in such solutions which causes the death of guinea pigs on intravenous injection. Its activity is prevented by the presence of minute amounts of cholesterin. Following the injection of this solution into rabbits and sheep, the sera of these animals acquire increased power of inhibiting its hemolytic action. It therefore possesses antigenic properties. It may therefore be concluded that the bodies of pneumococci contain a toxin that is hemolytic for red blood corpuscles. This substance is not simply a product of autolysis but undoubtedly exists preformed in the bacterial cell. However, it is not given up to the surrounding fluid as long as the bodies of the bacteria are intact. It may therefore be considered a hemolytic endotoxin.
1. Pneumococci in contact with hemoglobin transform this into methemoglobin. This reaction occurs only when the pneumococci are living; it is not induced by the culture fluid or by extracts of the bacteria. 2. The reaction does not occur when hemoglobin is added to an emulsion of washed pneumococci in salt solution. However, if minute traces of dextrose be added to such a mixture, the reaction quickly occurs. The dextrose may be replaced by any one of a number of other sugars, and also by certain other organic substances, if the latter are added in large amounts. Certain other organic substances are not able to replace dextrose, but it has been impossible to determine any special molecular configuration on which this property depends. 3. The formation of methemoglobin by pneumococci probably resembles the formation of methemoglobin by certain chemical substances, such as aminophenol. 4. From the work of others it is probable that the formation of methemoglobin is always a reaction of oxidation. In the formation of methemoglobin by reducing agents, the latter are first oxidized, this occurring better in the presence of oxyhemoglobin. In certain instances an alternate oxidative and reduction of the transforming agent occurs, so that the reaction is continuous. The effect which the presence or absence of free oxygen has on the reaction with pneumococci suggests that this follows similar lines. 5. The reaction does not occur in the absence of oxygen. If the free oxygen be first removed, and then replaced, the reaction occurs more rapidly than if the oxygen had not been removed. The presence of free oxygen in excess slightly delays the reaction, possibly because of the inhibition of the reduction process which forms the first part of the reaction. 6. The explanation of this phenomenon of methemoglobin production is not only of importance so far as this special reaction is concerned, but also because it suggests an explanation for the manner in which pathological effects are produced by those bacteria which apparently produce no soluble toxin.
Our experiments have shown definitely that guinea pigs, once injected with sublethal doses of bacterial proteotoxins (anaphylatoxins), acquire distinct tolerance to these poisons. The degree to which such resistance or tolerance is developed is never very high, in no case in our experiments exceeding the ability to withstand one and one half to twice the fatal dose of the poisons. During the three or four days immediately following the first injection the animals appear to be slightly less resistant than are normal controls, this depending probably upon the in jury done by the administered poison. Tolerance begins to be evident after from four to seven days, seems to be most highly developed in about two weeks, but lasts in a diminishing degree for at least as long as sixty days. Our experience, in this respect, with the poisons resulting from the contact of active serum and bacteria is similar to that of Vaughan with the toxic protein split products obtained by chemical methods. The development of increased resistance definitely established, the questions immediately arise: (1) Is this tolerance specific? And (2) can it be passively transferred, with the serum, to a normal animal? We have begun to seek answers for these problems but as yet our data are too meager to permit definite conclusions. The significance of the existence of higher resistance in animals treated with proteotoxins is far reaching both in connection with anaphylaxis and with immunity in general. We are not inclined to attribute to it as predominant a part in anti-anaphylaxis as is assigned to it by Bessau. For, in the first place, tolerance to the poisons is never developed to a very high degree, and, moreover, it does not become evident until three or four days after the first injection, while anti-anaphylaxis develops almost immediately after shock. However, there seems to us to be strong presumptive evidence that such tolerance to the poisons may play an important and, possibly, a non-specific part in anti-anaphylaxis, the chief underlying and specific cause of this phenomenon being the exhaustion of antibodies, or desensitization in the sense of Besredka. The relation of such tolerance to the resistance of the animal to bacterial infection is, of course, obvious if we accept the possibility of the production of such poisons in the injected body and their participation in the production of bacterial toxemia. We hope to throw more light on these relations in another paper dealing with the aggressin-like properties of the proteotoxins.
Mice either normal or splenectomized after exposure to X-ray are markedly more susceptible to bovine tuberculosis than are normal animals. Animals splenectomized a short time prior to inoculation are also more susceptible than normal, while those splenectomized eight to ten days before inoculation have about the same resistance as normal. The mice splenectomized three to four weeks before inoculation have a resistance increased over the normal, as has already been shown by Lewis and Margot. As X-ray in the doses used apparently affects only the lymphoid tissue and as the hypertrophy of the remaining lymphoid tissue after splenectomy is so rapid that the circulating lymphocytes may be much above the normal by the third week, it is concluded that this evidence, taken with the well known association of the lymphocytes with tuberculous lesions, points strongly to the lymphocyte as an important agent in the defensive mechanism against tuberculosis.
The cause of the frequent localization of secondary tumors at points of injury is not known. Our work deals with this problem. For the experiments the peritoneal cavity has been employed as offering relatively uncomplicated conditions, and the fate of mouse tumor brought into contact with a peritoneal lining injured in various ways has been studied. The injection of a suspension of mouse tumor into a healthy peritoneal cavity has little success as a rule compared with a similar injection into the subcutaneous tissue. We have found that the resistance of the peritoneal lining thus indicated can be largely if not completely abolished by the preliminary injection of a mechanical irritant (Kieselguhr, lycopodium). That the change thus brought about is independent of general immunity phenomena is shown by the fact that a local injury renders susceptible the part of the peritoneum immediately affected and that part only. Special tests show that the factor important in rendering the peritoneum more susceptible is the injury to the subendothelial connective tissue. Susceptibility persists after the endothelium has regenerated over the reacting connective tissue. Schmidt has found that the cells of tumor emboli in the pulmonary arterioles are able to penetrate the endothelium of the vessel only after they have been provided with a stroma from the subendothelial connective tissue. Our findings are easily explained on the basis thus suggested. A connective tissue highly cellular and perhaps still proliferating as the result of injury may well elaborate the stroma for a tumor more rapidly than normal connective tissue. Tests of growth in vitro support this idea. Connective tissue reacting to an injury grows profusely and almost immediately when incubated in plasma, whereas normal tissue from the same region shows usually no growth whatever. Dead tumor fragments in contact with the peritoneum cause a change favorable to the lodgment and growth of later tumor fragments. It seems not improbable that the peritoneal dissemination of certain human neoplasms may be accomplished indirectly through the death of the first tumor fragments cast off. Our observations have been purposely confined to the effects of injury on the peritoneal lining ; but they seem to afford the basis for a generalization. The secondary localization of tumors at points of injury may be attributed with good reason to the presence at such points of an active connective tissue capable of elaborating a stroma rapidly and abundantly. For it is the proliferation of the subendothelial connective tissue to form a supporting stroma that determines the fate of free tumor cells, whether these lie on the peritoneum or within a vessel.
A transplantable sarcoma of the fowl, known as Chicken Tumor XVIII, in our series, succeeds better in chickens of an alien breed (Plymouth Rock) than in those of the variety in which it originated (brown Leghorn). This is not due to gross physical differences in the two breeds but to some more subtle factor and one which perhaps acts by influencing the agent causing the tumor. It would seem that Chicken Tumor XVIII, as it occurred in nature, was an instance of a disease appearing spontaneously in an animal of relatively insusceptible variety.
The phenomena of natural and acquired resistance to transplanted chicken tumors strikingly resemble those observed in the case of transplanted mammalian growths; and no more than those do they suggest that the tumors have an extrinsic cause. That there may exist in fowls implanted with a chicken tumor a resistance directed against the tumor-causing agent distinct from the resistance manifested against the alien tumor cells has been shown in a previous article. Both sorts of resistance are present in a fowl in which a tumor has retrogressed, the resistance in such an instance being acquired. That directed against the agent is largely specific, giving little if any protection against the agents causing other tumors. There is some evidence that the conditions upon which a fowl's natural resistance depends are the same for the agents causing different chicken tumors. It has proved impossible to protect chickens against the agent causing the simple sarcoma by injecting them with dried tumor material in which this agent has been attenuated by heat. The transfer of blood from resistant fowls to fowls with growing tumors is in our experience void of effect on the tumors.
Previous work has shown that the growth of grafts of transplantable tumors can be in many cases prevented or retarded by underfeeding the new host or by putting it on a special diet. The effect of such treatment on large tumors has been little studied; and the effect on metastases and recurrences has not been studied at all. Apart from certain clinical observations nothing is known as to the influence on spontaneous tumors of alterations in the diet. Experiments with transplanted rat and mouse tumors along the lines thus suggested show that large growths of certain strains are checked in their development by underfeeding the host upon a special diet (Sweet's modification of one of Mendel and Osborne's foods) or in some cases by simple underfeeding. Two metastasizing mouse tumors are instances in point. They stopped growing or grew very slowly in hosts underfed on the special diet. The Flexner-Jobling rat carcinoma, on the other hand, was unaffected by the most rigorous underfeeding on a mixed diet when this was begun after the tumor had been growing for a short period. Experiments to test the influence of underfeeding upon recurrences of this tumor gave results that varied from series to series of animals. The findings strongly indicate that generalizations from work with transplanted tumors as regards the effects of diet on spontaneous growths are unwarranted. By underfeeding on Sweet's food mice with spontaneous tumors, beginning some days prior to operation, it has proved possible in most cases to delay for a relatively long period the development of recurrences and the growth of tumor bits (grafts) disseminated at the time of surgical interference. The treatment entailed great loss of weight. Tumor mice kept on ordinary diet previous to operation, but put thereafter on an abundant ration of Sweet's food, developed recurrences as early as the tumor mice on ordinary diet; whereas the growth of auto-implants was, relatively speaking, much delayed. These results seem attributable rather to a gradual malnutrition induced by the special food than to the circumstance that it lacked a growth principle. In none of the dieted mice was a definite cure obtained. Ordinarily a recurrence appeared and the grafts began to grow soon after the host, again on ordinary food, had regained weight. A few spontaneous tumors seem absolutely unaffected by the most rigorous dieting. Wounds heal with marked slowness in animals that have become thin as a result of dieting, and an inert foreign body (agar-agar) injected subcutaneously is very slowly encapsulated and organized. In these facts may be found a suggestion as to the method whereby dieting delays tumor growth. For it may well be that, with a lessened proliferative activity of the host tissue, the elaboration of a vascularizing and supporting stroma such as most tumors depend upon for their growth, at least indirectly, is much delayed. The rapid growth of tumors in emaciating individuals is not incompatible with the present findings. Such growth may be consequent upon a selection in the host of those cells most fit to cope with the increasingly difficult nutritive conditions. But experiments designed to demonstrate this have been unsuccessful. It is conceivable that recurrences of certain human tumors and the development of metastases may be delayed or prevented for a period by methods somewhat similar to those employed against spontaneous mouse tumors in the present investigation. But generally speaking only the more malignant human tumors would require such palliative measures, and these are precisely the ones that would prove,-if experience with mice is an index,-least amenable to alterations in the nutrition of the host.
1. Intact bacteria probably resist tryptic digestion because of the absence of an exposed protein substrate. 2. Dried organisms resist digestion in a degree proportional to their content of unsaturated lipoids. 3. Lipoidal extractives reduce the resistance to tryptic digestion. 4. The extracted lipoids (saponified) are antitryptic in a degree proportional to their unsaturation. 5. The inactivation of the antiferment in Gram-negative organisms is probably due to changes in the degree of lipoidal dispersion. 6. Bacteria adsorb lipoids from the serum when incubated at 37 degrees C. Such organisms when dried are found to be more resistant to tryptic digestion than untreated organisms.
1. The antitryptic titer of the serum can be increased by subcutaneous injections of serum lipoids (antitrypsin) and of the lipoids from egg yolk. 2. Animals so injected show a relative immunity to acute anaphylactic shock (two minimum lethal doses). 3. Extraction of lipoids contained in antigens increases the toxicity of the antigen when injected into a sensitized animal. 4. Sublethal doses of soap solutions injected simultaneously with the antigen (purified horse serum albumen) prevent anaphylactic shock. 5. The refractory state following anaphylactic shock is related in part to an increase in the antitryptic titer of the serum.
Rachitic changes in the bones and teeth occur in young albino rats as the result of spontaneous disease, possibly of infective origin. This disease is often, but not always, accompanied by an arrest of growth and malnutrition. There is no valid reason for attributing such lesions to the loss of thymic function. In some of the rats showing the disease, an unusual number of mitoses were found in the parathyroid glands, but no evidence of injury to these structures. It has not been found possible to confirm the statements of Klose and Magnini as to the fatal effects of complete thymus extirpation in rats.
We have described the methods used in determining the influence of certain substances on tumor growth, and we measured approximately the degree of reliability of the quantitative method used. We examined with these methods various classes of substances,- distilled water, a number of inorganic salts, inorganic colloidal substances, various organic colloidal and non-colloidal substances, especially various proteids, tuberculin and hirudin alone as well as in combination with other substances. Distilled water, various inorganic sulphur preparations, and various inorganic salts did not show an inhibiting effect on tumor growth sufficient to be detected by means of our first method. Only in the case of gold potassium cyanide was there possibly a slightly retarding influence present. On the other hand, certain colloidal solutions of heavy metals (copper, platinum, gold) retard the growth of a number of tumors of injected animals. Certain combinations of copper salts and casein act in a similar manner. Of the organic substances used, casein, nucleoproteid, and hirudin were active, while the other proteids tested, as well as various other organic substances and tuberculin and lecithin, seemed to be either without effect or weaker than the other substances mentioned as retarding the tumor growth. Hirudin was active and caused in addition to its inhibiting influence the retrogression of a certain number of tumors. Especially active was a combination of hirudin with colloidal copper and of hirudin with nucleoproteid. One single injection of casein or nucleoproteid, or of the Heyden preparation of colloidal copper, leads to a more or less marked edematous condition of a certain number of tumors, while hirudin caused in addition, in many cases, marked hemorrhages in or around the tumors. Other substances which we tested did not show this effect, although their inhibiting action on tumor growth may have been equally strong. Very young tumors (two to six days old) are not retarded in their growth through injection of colloidal copper or hirudin, while nine to thirteen days old tumors are, independently of their size on the ninth day, inhibited in approximately the same relative degree; absolutely, however, the more rapidly growing smaller tumors are more markedly inhibited than the normally more slowly growing larger tumors.
1. Through a set of preliminary injections of colloidal copper or hirudin, given from the second to the sixth day after transplantation, we can weaken the effect of injections of the same substances given from the ninth to the thirteenth day after transplantation. 2. Injections of colloidal copper given before the transplantation of the tumor lead to a weakening of the effect of injections given from the ninth to the thirteenth day after transplantation. 3. The same result can be obtained if we inject colloidal copper or hirudin into mice from the second to the sixth and from the ninth to the thirteenth day after transplantation, and use these tumors at the end of the series of injections for further transplantation into another set of mice; the developing tumors are more resistant to the action of colloidal copper or hirudin than new control tumors. 4. We may therefore conclude that the immunity has two sources: (a) it is based on changes taking place somewhere in the host organism; and (b) it is localized in the tumor cells themselves which transfer this immunity to the following generations of tumor cells. 5. The immunity acquired against colloidal copper does not protect noticeably against the action of hirudin, and vice versa. The immunity is therefore specific. 6. We discuss certain general conclusions which may be drawn from these experiments. We expect to test the validity of these results in further experiments.
Repeated injections of colloidal copper, hirudin, nucleoprotein, and casein, which have a definite retarding influence on tumor growth, given to mice during the process of wound healing do not produce any noticeable influence on the course of regeneration.
1. Gentian violet may be regarded as a true vital nuclear stain. 2. Embryonic and adult tissue of the frog will grow in vitro in the presence of gentian violet of a far stronger dilution than that necessary to kill many bacteria. In these experiments, for example, successful tissue growths were obtained when gentian violet 1 to 20,000 was used, yet Bacillus subtilis will not grow in 1 to 100,000 dilution and grows very badly in 1 to 1,000,000 dilution. This fact may simplify the technique of the growth of certain tissues by eliminating the risk of bacterial contamination. 3. The use of stains in the plasma in which tissue is grown will probably facilitate the study of nuclear growth. 4. Gentian violet appears to have a certain selective action on tissue similar to that exercised by the dye on bacteria. Certain observations made last year in this laboratory (too few to serve as more than a suggestion) seem to indicate that another dye (methylene blue) acted as a stimulant to the growth of connective tissue. These leads should be followed out and the effect of various stains studied in the hope of discovering dyes which will exercise a sharp selective action on growing tissue. 5. The growth of animal cells in a strength of dye much more than sufficient to kill many pathogenic organisms lends encouragement to efforts now being made in this laboratory to apply the observations on the bactericidal effect of gentian violet and allied stains to the treatment of disease. Moreover, the ability of growing cells to rid themselves of this dye would indicate that it may be possible to apply the dye to infected tissue and count on the cells to eliminate the material after its work had been done.
The cultivation of cells in vitro affords a valuable means of estimating the effects of tissue extracts. Tissue extracts have a definite effect upon the growth of adult mammalian cells in vitro. The majority of tissue extracts stimulate the growth of connective tissue, but liver extract inhibits it. The extracts are to a certain extent specific in their action upon the growth of parenchymatous cells. Some cells are stimulated by one extract and inhibited by another, and those extracts which inhibit one type of parenchymatous cell may stimulate another type. Homogenous and autogenous extracts are equally efficacious in their action upon the growth of cells. The extracts may be preserved for a short period of time without suffering any change in their power of affecting the growth of cells.
1. Besredka's living sensitized vaccine, given intravenously, does not produce a typhoid lesion of the gall bladder in the rabbit. 2. The first transplant of this vaccine is capable of producing this lesion. Hence this vaccine is not entirely safe to handle. 3. Regular infections of the gall bladder have not been produced by carrying a known pathogenic strain on rabbit blood agar, by successive passage through animals, or by the use of freshly isolated strains. 4. No evidence could be demonstrated in the rabbit of the immunity produced in man by vaccination with a whole killed vaccine. 5. Vaccine treatment did not cure the gall bladder lesion. 6. With the present methods of producing infections in the chimpanzee and the rabbit, neither of these animals is suitable for deciding the problems of the immunization of man by vaccines. These problems must be settled, as some of them already have been settled, by actual experience with large numbers of men kept under close observation.
1. Our experiments show that proteotoxin (anaphylatoxin) produced with typhoid bacilli and active guinea pig serum, by the general method of Friedberger, possesses aggressin-like action in that, when injected together with sublethal doses of bacteria, it renders them lethal. 2. This action is not specific, since even when typhoid bacilli are used in its production, the proteotoxin possesses this property not only for typhoid bacilli, but for staphylococci and prodigiosus bacilli, the only other organisms with which we worked. 3. This action is manifest in the experiment only when quantities of proteotoxin are used which can produce a certain degree of systemic poisoning. 4. It is not due to anti-opsonic action since the phagocytosis of staphylococci in the presence of active serum takes place readily in spite of the presence of relatively considerable amounts of the poison. 5. The aggressin-like action of the proteotoxin is probably due to the leucopenia that it causes. It is not likely that this leucopenia is dependent upon a negative chemotactic action, in the ordinary sense of this term, but it is probably due to the general intoxication of the animal, resulting among other things in the poisoning of those tissue elements which ordinarily react to infection with the mobilization of leucocytes in the circulation. It has seemed to us that the results of our experiments were of interest also in throwing some light on the general problem of virulence. The thought naturally suggests itself that Bail's so called aggressins were nothing more or less than proteotoxins, or anaphylatoxin. It has been shown by Friedberger and Nathan (3) that poisons of this description may be formed in the peritoneal cavities of animals, and if we examine the method by which Bail (4) prepared his aggressive exudates, it seems likely that they contained proteotoxins. Moreover, although Bail's aggressins are described as non-toxic in themselves, this is a discrepancy to which, it seems to us, no great weight need be attached in this connection, since the poisonous properties of the proteotoxins are clearly apparent only when considerable amounts, two to three cubic centimeters, are intravenously injected into young guinea pigs, and below this quantity a threshold is rapidly reached beyond which no visible reaction whatever is achieved. We have not yet, it is true, shown that animals may be immunized against bacterial infection by treatment with the proteotoxins, a result obtained by Bail with his aggressins. But we feel that the mere fact that tolerance to proteotoxin may be established, a phenomenon which has been the subject of an earlier paper, is a step in this direction. Further than this the analogy cannot be carried since we do not know as yet whether the proteotoxin tolerance is specific,-a fact which would be necessary in order to identify completely these substances with the substances studied by Bail. In view, however, of the many objections that have been voiced against this phase of Bail's work, and of the fact that a rapid accumulation of leucocytes is described as characteristic of aggressin immunity, it seems not unlikely that even in this aspect of the problem aggressin and proteotoxin may eventually be identified. It is probable, also, if we reason logically from the premises which our experiments supply, that the power of invasion of many microorganisms is intimately related to their ability to react with the active blood constituents of the infected animal. This has already been suggested in the work of Embleton and Thiele (5). If, indeed, the condition of bacterial anaphylaxis or hypersusceptibility depends upon the establishment of a balance between the injected bacterial antigen and the blood constituents, such that proteotoxins are formed, a supposition rendered probable by much recent work, then our experiments would tend to show that bacterial anaphylaxis implies, at the same time, a condition of lessened resistance to invasion by the bacteria (6). It may even be that generalized invasion, after localization, must await the striking of such a balance, an interval which, in the case of diseases like typhoid fever, may form a part of the incubation time. At the same time, in such diseases, the action of the proteotoxin would explain the leucopenia that accompanies the bacterial invasion. We do not, of course, expect to explain virulence in general by these phenomena. In the case of organisms like the pyogenic cocci, the pneumococcus, and some other bacteria, there is apparently another important element contributed in the resistance of the invader to direct reaction with the active serum constituents. In many of these organisms the slight extent or absence of serum lysis or even bactericidal action would point in this direction, and here the appearance of proteotoxin would be secondary in importance or possibly absent entirely until late in severe infections. The non-specificity of the aggressive action of proteotoxin goes far toward explaining the increased susceptibility to other, secondary infections apparent during the course of many cases of typhoid fever and in some other diseases. It should also have an important bearing on our understanding of mixed infections.
1. This method of determining the actual number of Purkinje cells present in a given area of cerebellum is practicable and of sufficient accuracy to make it another useful means of studying nerve cell activity. 2. In its application to clinical cases it is found that increasing nerve cell exhaustion is accompanied by increasing nerve cell disappearance, although it is recognized that theoretically complete nerve cell exhaustion could be present without nerve cell disappearance on account of the individual dying before phagocytic action could take place. 3. This disappearance of nerve cells corroborates the theories and observations made on phagocytosis of nerve cells, inasmuch as it shows that nerve cells disappear from the brain. 4. While there are too few cases to establish a normal actual Purkinje cell count, it is of interest to note that there were 16.6 per cent. fewer cells in the case with the maximum cell exhaustion (57 per cent.) than in the case of the normal man (2 per cent.).
1. Agglutinins are present in the blood of patients suffering from lobar pneumonia during some stage of the disease in a large percentage (73.8 per cent.) of the cases due to pneumococci belonging in groups I, II, and IV. 2. In most very severe and fatal cases agglutinins cannot be demonstrated, and it is probable that their absence during the later days of the disease may have unfavorable prognostic significance. 3. No agglutinins are demonstrable by the technique employed in the blood of patients suffering from infection with Pneumococcus mucosus (group III). 4. In certain cases agglutinins may be demonstrable for only one day, and in other cases they may persist for several weeks. 5. When agglutinins are demonstrable they usually appear at about the time of the crisis. 6. It has not been possible to demonstrate that treatment with immune serum has any effect on the appearance of agglutinins. 7. The agglutinins present in cases due to organisms of types I and II are always specific for the type of organism causing the infection. In certain cases the agglutination reaction may be more active or appear earlier when the homologous organism is employed than when other organisms of the group are used in the test. In cases due to organisms of type IV, the serum never causes agglutination of any organism except the homologous one.
1. Fragments of skin taken from the back of the leopard frog were cultivated in a mixture of plasma and muscle extract of the same species. 2. A few hours after explanation, processes of activity are seen to arise, which finally lead to the formation of a compact epithelial rim around the fragment of skin. 3. These epithelial cells undergo gradual transformation into a spindle-shaped type of cell; in this form they resemble the spindle cells which have been described as connective tissue cells. 4. The growth of a rim of tissue around the explanted fragments of skin may be ascribed principally to the activity of a basal layer of epithelial cells, the units of which first advance into the medium as compact membranes by means of the so called epithelial movement, but which later become separated from the compact membrane, and having assume a spindle form, spread according to the manner of connective tissue cells. 5. In contradistinction to this basal layer, the cells of an upper and middle layer of epithelium upon separation from the fragment of skin and isolation in the nutritive medium, remain completely inactive. 6. The connective tissue of frog skin, for reasons not yet completely established, does not participate in the production of the rim of cells, possibly for the reason that it was early surrounded by the epithelium and was thus prevented from sending out cells into the medium. 7. The transformation of the epithelial cells into a type of cells of the spindle form is a result of the changes in the physicochemical conditions brought about by the life in vitro, which become similar to the physicochemical conditions normally characteristic of connective tissue. 8. The final stage of the explanted fragments of skin is a hollow epithelial sphere (cystic stage) filled with connective tissue. 9. During the cystic stage the epithelium again shows its normal polar differentiation, as a consequence of the physicochemical conditions which now approach normal. 10. These conditions also permit of the shedding of cells in a vertical direction, although previously the production of cells in a horizontal direction had already become impossible.
1. A comparative study of the resting and regenerating epidermis of the rat, pigeon, and guinea pig shows the connection between the structure of the skin and the proliferating power of the epithelial cells. We may at present distinguish two types of epidermal cells: (a) cells with less proliferative energy (pigeon and rat), and (b) cells with a greater proliferative power (guinea pig); the former provides the element from which the type of a thin epidermis is built up, while from the latter the type of a thick epidermis develops. 2. The cell type with greater proliferative power in the normal skin shows also greater proliferative power during regeneration, and the regenerative stimulus causes approximately the same relative increase in the number and size of cells and nuclei in both kinds of skin during regeneration, provided that we base our determination of the number of mitoses on the same unit number of cells in both skins rather than on the same unit area. The absolute increase in the number of cells during regeneration is greatest in the type with the greatest proliferative power in the normal cell (guinea pig). 3. The number of mitoses and the size of cells and nuclei follow a similar curve in the different species during regeneration. They reach a maximum approximately on the 7th day; remain stationary or show some decline from the 7th day on until the time of the closure of the wound; following the closure a further fall takes place; but the figures remain higher than in the normal epidermis for a considerable period afterwards. There seems, therefore, to exist under the conditions of our experimentation a period of approximately 7 days, at the end of which the regenerative stimulus reaches its maximum effect. The closure of the wound represents probably an additional factor determining the curve of cell proliferation. Failure of the wound to close at an early date seems to make the decline in the number of mitoses sharp after the maximum has been reached. 4. The curve representing the thickness of living regenerating epithelium declines much more slowly than the curve representing cell size and number of mitoses. This indicates probably that even after closure of the wound some push of epithelial cell towards the center of the former wound continues to take place. 5. From the second day the additional growth of the epidermal tongue decreases in each successive period, if we use the length of the tongue at the beginning of each period as the unit of measurement. 6. Retraction and contraction of the wound are factors additional to epithelial movements and epithelial proliferation determining the closure of the wound.
It has been established that specific liver poisons (chloroform, phosphorus) which cause histological changes in the liver cells, decrease the liver excretion of phenoltetrachlorphthalein. Also vascular disturbances (Eck fistula, passive congestion) with or without histological evidence may cause a fall in the output of phthalein through the liver. Sufficient evidence has been brought forward to show that the phenoltetrachlorphthalein excretion is a valuable index concerning the functional capacity of the liver. Ether anesthesia for a period of two hours usually causes a depression in the phthalein curve during the twenty-four hours following the anesthesia. Paraldehyde in doses sufficient to give anesthesia and stupor for a few hours will give adefinite fall in phthalein excretion. Chloral and urethane usually cause a decrease in phthalein output when given in considerable amounts. Alcohol causes a drop in the phthalein curve when given in large doses sufficient to cause stupor for a few hours. The drop in phenoltetrachlorphthalein excretion is demonstrated in the twenty-four hours following administration of the drug. A drop in the phthalein curve to two-thirds or one-half of normal indicates a definite liver injury and temporary impairment of function.
We consider themost importantcontribution reported in this paper the fact that Treponema pallidum can be cultivated in fluid media, without the addition of agar, together with tissues sterilized by heat. This forms an excellent method of obtaining mass cultures for luetin preparation and immunological experimentation. We may add that while the tissue varieties employed have all stongly favored the growth of the treponemata, we have noticed especially active and motile cultures when lung and suprarenal tissues were employed.
1. The Abderhalden reaction is specific. 2. The properties of serum on which it depends develop in experimental animals simultaneously with antibodies during the process of immunization. 3. It is impossible to observe by direct methods the presence of digesting ferments in the blood of immune animals. 4. The Abderhalden test may be resolved into two phases. A dialyzable substance appears in the second phase and is the result of the autodigestion of serum. 5. The autodigestion of serum in the Abderhalden test is due to the removal of antitrypsin from the serum by the sensitized substratum.
1. Normal serum protease is not specific; it is active in both dilute acid as well as alkaline media. It is destroyed by heating to 70 degrees C. for thirty minutes. It is markedly impaired when heated at 56 degrees C. for thirty minutes. It is inhibited by the unsaturated soaps and lipoids. 2. Guinea pig and rabbit serum contain relatively much protease; the leucocytes are without proteolytic ferments. 3. Normal human and dog serum contain little or no protease; the leucocytes are strongly proteolytic. 4. Serum complement and protease are not identical. 5. During various pathological conditions the non-specific protease is increased in both human and dog serum. 6. An increase in antiferment is in many instances coincident. 7. During the Abderhalden reaction the placental tissue becomes more resistant to enzyme action, because of the adsorption of the antiferment from the serum. 8. The dialyzed serum loses antiferment because of adsorption by the placental tissue or other adsorbing substances, including probably the dialyzing membrane. 9. The digestive substrate is the serum protein made available for protease action by the adsorption of the antiferment. 10. The proteases in pathological conditions investigated by us (pregnancy, tuberculosis, and pneumonia) are non-specific.
1. Serum of various animals preserves the motility of nagana trypanosomes better and longer than salt solution. 2. To act best in this way the serum should not be diluted more than 2 to 4 times. Undiluted serum is perhaps best. 3. Serum filtered through a Berkefeld filter, bottled aseptically, and kept in the ice box preserves this activating property apparently undiminished for many months. 4. Serum preserves the motility of trypanosomes better than "Sals physiologicum" of Merck, and better than the Ringer solutions of Meltzer and Carrel. 5. Serum preserves the normal morphology of trypanosomes better than the Ringer solutions tested. 6. The infectiousness of trypanosomes suspended in cattle serum was preserved at room temperature for at least 8 days. 7. The vitality of the trypanosomes in serum was seemingly better preserved at room temperature than at ice box temperature. 8. Serum incubated with atoxyl does not transform it into a toxic substance. 9. Serum does not bind paraminophenylarsenoxyd, for trypanosomes suspended in serum are often immobilized more quickly by paraminophenylarsenoxyd than trypanosomes suspended in salt solution. 10. Serum is suitable for suspending trypanosomes for certain experiments in vitro, and with proper precautions may be employed for transporting virus from laboratory to laboratory.
1. 10 per cent. atoxyl in blood incubated at 37 degrees C. for 1 hour gives rise to a solution that is much more than ten times as toxic as a 1 per cent. solution of atoxyl similarly incubated. 2. When the comparison is made after incubation for 3 hours instead of for 1 hour, the toxicity of the 10 per cent. solution is but slightly greater than ten times that of the 1 per cent., provided the red blood corpuscles are not removed from the dilutions. 3. If the corpuscles are removed from both the 10 per cent. and the 1 per cent. atoxyl solutions immediately after incubation at 37 degrees for 1 to 3 hours, the dilutions of the 10 per cent. atoxyl are much more than ten times as toxic as the corresponding dilutions of the 1 per cent. atoxyl. 4. After incubation with atoxyl at 37 degrees for 1 to 3 hours, red blood corpuscles left at room temperature in dilutions made from the 10 per cent. and 1 per cent. solutions in blood increase markedly the toxicity of the dilutions made from the 1 per cent. atoxyl, but increase very slightly the toxicity of the dilutions made from the 10 per cent. atoxyl. 5. If one desires to produce a large amount of transformed atoxyl by incubating atoxyl in blood at 37 degrees for 1 to 3 hours, strong solutions of atoxyl should be chosen in preference to weaker solutions.
1. The transforming power of red blood cells for atoxyl is apparently uninfluenced by a preliminary heating of the blood for 30 minutes at 50 degrees C., but a temperature of 55 degrees C. acting for 30 minutes destroys this property of blood almost completely. 2. When the heating was for 60 minutes, 54 degrees C. and higher temperatures apparently destroyed all the transforming power. 3. After heating for 10 minutes, 70 degrees C. destroyed almost all the transforming power, and 100 degrees C. seemingly destroyed all. 4. Under the influence of certain temperatures blood seemingly binds transformed atoxyl, and under the influence of other temperatures frees it again. A temperature of 70 degrees C. for 10 minutes applied to blood subsequent to its incubation with atoxyl causes nearly all the toxicity of the solution to disappear. On the other hand, a temperature of 100 degrees C. for 10 minutes applied to blood subsequent to incubation with atoxyl leaves the solution almost as toxic as if the blood had not been heated at all after the incubation. 5. Some of the transformed atoxyl bound by blood when it is heated to 70 degrees C. for 10 minutes is freed if the heating at 70 degrees C. is prolonged to 30 minutes. See PDF for Structure 6. Blood which has bound transformed atoxyl gives up most, but not all, of this toxic substance when heated to 100 degrees for 10 minutes. All, or nearly all, is freed when the heating at 100 degrees C. is continued for 30 minutes. 7. Under the influence of 70 degrees C. for io minutes transformed atoxyl may be made to enter blood corpuscles, for the fluid above these corpuscles is rendered non-toxic and does not become toxic again when heated to 100 degrees for 20 minutes, provided it contains no laked blood. The blood corpuscles, on the other hand, when heated to 100 degrees for 20 minutes in contact with fresh salt solution, make this solution quite toxic. 8. Laked blood in contact with transformed atoxyl behaves like unlaked blood when heated to 70 degrees C. and to 100 degrees C. for 10 to 30 minutes. 9. The toxic substance can be concentrated by heating the blood corpuscles in contact with transformed atoxyl to 70 degrees C. for 10 minutes, centrifugalizing, removing a large part of the supernatant fluid, and then heating to 100 degrees C. for 30 minutes. 10. The power of blood to take up and bind transformed atoxyl is destroyed apparently completely by heating blood to 100 degrees C. for 10 minutes. 11. The toxic substance into which atoxyl is transformed (transformed atoxyl) is thermostabile, but the transforming agent in blood is thermolabile.
1. The administration of emulsions of the anterior lobe of the ox pituitary increases very markedly the rate of growth of the primary tumor in rats inoculated with carcinoma. The growth of small tumors is accelerated relatively more than that of large tumors. 2. This acceleration is only evidenced, however, at a certain stage in the growth of the tumor, subsequent to the twentieth day succeeding inoculation. The administrations do not enhance the tendency of the tumors to metastasize. 3. Liver emulsion does not cause an acceleration of the growth of carcinomata in rats.
1. Two principal types of gonococci may be recognized by suitable immunological tests; e. g., agglutination and complement fixation. These two types correspond to the adult and infant types of infection with the gonococcus, seen clinically. 2. On the basis of the immunological reactions of agglutination and complement fixation the strains of gonococci isolated from three cases of ophthalmia are classed with the adult type. 3. A polyvalent antigen for the serological diagnosis of a gonococcus infection should represent strains of the infant type of organism in order that both types of infection, infant as well as adult, may be recognized.
1. The production of lobar pneumonia in rabbits is dependent upon the introduction of organisms into the alveoli themselves. 2. In order to accomplish this the catheter through which they are injected must be inserted as deeply into a bronchus as possible and the culture fluid injected with considerable force. 3. Large numbers of organisms injected into the trachea just beyond the larynx set up no great changes in the lungs, even though the injection be forcible. This fact suggests the presence of a protective mechanism in the upper air passages, which, under normal conditions, prevents the penetration of organisms into the lungs. 4. If animals be subjected to cold, alcohol, and the inhalation of irritating gases, the so called secondary factors in the etiology of lobar pneumonia in man, then the injection of pneumococci into the trachea causes inflammatory changes of the upper respiratory tract and occasionally pneumonia. 5. The vagi prevent foreign material in the pharynx and upper respiratory tract from reaching the lungs. Section of one vagus may be followed by pneumonia, while section of both invariably leads to this result. 6. It is possible that the secondary factors mentioned above owe their action to their influence upon the vagus control of the upper respiratory tract.
1. Dead leucocytes are constantly found in the pneumonic exudate. They rapidly undergo disintegration. Up to the seventh day they do not form the majority of the cells of the exudate. 2. Polymorphonuclear leucocytes with vitally stained granules are present in the exudate, vessels, and interstitial tissue of the lung in experimental pneumonia, but they are not demonstrable in the general circulation in the same animals. 3. There is a marked impairment of the circulation in the pneumonic lung. 4. The increase in the intra-alveolar pressure exerted by the exudate has no influence upon the circulation. 5. The impaired circulation results from the wide distribution of capillary fibrin thrombi. In man these are, as a rule, distributed with relative uniformity. In the rabbit this is not usually the case. The thrombi are much more abundant in some areas and may lead to localized necrosis. 6. The impairment of the circulation is of importance in bringing about resolution. Only enough blood is allowed to seep through the vessels to nourish the alveolar walls. Consequently very little serum escapes into the alveoli and the autolysis of the exudate by the leucocytes is unhindered. 7. The impairment of the circulation in the pneumonic lung seriously interferes with the action of intravenous therapy upon the local lesion. 8. The exudate in the pneumonic lung can be readily impregnated with a dye injected intrabronchially. This suggests a method of administration of therapeutic agents in pneumonia.
Following the intravenous injection of an overwhelming dose of pneumococci in normal animals there is a rapidly increasing bacteriemia which reaches its maximum with the death of the animal. Immunized animals, whether the immunity is active or passive, whether the animals have their leucocytes, or whether these have been destroyed by benzol, react differently. They have incommon the ability to cause the organisms to decrease rapidly in number, and, as far as could be determined by the methods used, to disappear absolutely in a very short time from the circulation. This may be called the immediate reaction. In actively and passively immunized normal rabbits the disappearance of the organisms from the blood is followed by their destruction in the body and the ultimate recovery of the animal. This same result occurs also in actively immunized rabbits deprived of their polymorphonuclear leucocytes by benzol. On the contrary, in passively immunized rabbits, deprived of their leucocytes in the same way, the immediate disappearance of the organisms from the circulation is followed, after a lapse of from six to twenty-four hours, by a recurrent, gradually increasing bacteriemia and the death of the animal. It is evident that the immediate reaction is no index of the ultimate result. This finding, that the result of the intravenous injection of an overwhelming dose of pneumococci in immunized animals may be divided into two stages, immediate and ultimate, has been utilized in the interpretation of the experiments that have been reported above. 1. Normal Rabbits.-In the normal rabbit the injection of a lethal dose of pneumococci is followed by the same immediate and ultimate response. The animal develops a rapidly progressing bacteriemia and dies. 2. Passively Immunised Normal Rabbits.-A diametrically opposed finding is obtained when the animals are passively immunized. Then following the intravenous injection of pneumococci the organisms rapidly disappear from the circulating blood and the animal recovers. The only apparent difference between these two groups of experiments is the introduction of a relatively small quantity of immune serum. Tentatively, therefore, it may be concluded that the immune serum is responsible both for the immediate and ultimate reaction in this case. 3. Passively Immunized Aplastic Rabbits.-A normal rabbit that has been previously benzolized, and in this way deprived of its myeloid elements, can not be successfully immunized. Here the immune serum injected even in excessive quantities is followed by the immediate reaction, but the ultimate result is entirely different, -the animal dies. It may be concluded, therefore, that the serum is the potent factor in bringing about the immediate disappearance of the organisms from the circulation. Furthermore, it is evident that the white blood cells of the myeloid tissue are necessary in order that passively immunized animals may recover following the introduction of a lethal dose of pneumococci. So far it seems that two elements are essential in the immunity process; i. e., immune bodies and white blood cells. Corroborative evidence of the importance of the white blood cell in this reaction is offered by the hyperleucocytosis which follows the injection of antigen in actively immunized animals (Gay). This hyperleucocytosis occurs in actively immunized rabbits injected with pneumococci, after the organisms have disappeared from the circulation. It occurs at about the same time that the septicemia recurs in passively immunized aplastic rabbits. 4. Actively Immunized Aplastic Rabbits.-The experiments with actively immunized aplastic rabbits complicate the conception of the part of the white blood cells in the immunity process. When actively immunized, benzolized animals are injected with a lethal dose of pneumococci, the immediate reaction occurs just as in the passively immunized aplastic animal. Available antibodies are present and cause the disappearance of the organisms from the circulation. The ultimate reaction differs from that in the passively immunized aplastic animal. The latter develops a recurrent bacteriemia and dies. The actively immunized aplastic animal recovers. It would seem that the white blood cell is no longer necessary in an animal that has been actively immunized, but that it must be present for the passive protection of the animal. The ultimate reaction in immunized rabbits seems to be dependent upon some action of the white blood cells. In the passively immunized animal this may occur at the time of, or following, the immediate reaction; and if it can not occur, owing to the absence of the white blood cells, the animal subsequently dies. In the actively immunized aplastic rabbit this action has apparently occurred at a previous time and is sufficiently developed to protect the animal even though the leucocytes have been destroyed. It may be assumed that the function of the white blood cell is exercised not directly, but perhaps indirectly, by some influence exerted on other body cells. This interrelation or interaction between the white blood cells and other cells in the body constitutes a third factor essential to the ultimate protection of the animal. Additional evidence of this action of the white blood cell is furnished by further experiments with actively immunized aplastic rabbits. Several immunized rabbits were benzolized and then injected with a lethal dose of pneumococci. The results were the same as those indicated above. The organisms disappeared rapidly from the circulation and the animals recovered. An interval of five days was allowed to elapse and the animals were injected again with the same amount of pneumococci. This time the reaction was different. The organisms disappeared rapidly from the circulation, but there was a recurrent bacteriemia and the animals died. In these animals the favorable ultimate result after the first inoculation of a lethal dose of pneumococci probably depended upon the presence of the immune bodies and the third factor mentioned above. After the subsequent inoculation of pneumococci the immediate reaction was followed by the recurrence of the bacteriemia and the death of the animals. It may, therefore, be inferred that the third factor present at the time of the first injection had been destroyed, and, owing to the absence of white blood cells at the time of the subsequent inoculation, it was not formed again. It may be concluded that there are at least three elements necessary in the immunization process: (l) immune bodies, (2) white blood cells, and (3)a third factor which is dependent for its existence upon the presence of white blood cells at the time of inoculation of the pneumococci. Furthermore, this third factor may be removed if the animal is inoculated at a time when it is aplastic.
Decrease in coronary flow was the constant response of freshly isolated monkey hearts to epinephrin. These hearts were perfused with autogenous hirudinized blood diluted with Locke solution. The results were constant at high or low perfusion pressures, in beating or resting hearts, and with all adequate doses. Increased coronary flow was obtained constantly in rabbit hearts under identical conditions. In the light of previous work upon isolated human coronary arteries, the general conclusion is drawn that, while actively dilating the coronary vessels in the dog, cat, rabbit, ox, sheep, and pig, epinephrin constricts the coronary vessels in man and the monkey. The coronary arteries of the last two species are presumably supplied with constrictor nerves of true sympathetic (thoracicolumbar) origin.
A test is described for the estimation of antithrombin in the blood. The chief advantage of the test is that it is simple, and does not require the preparation of fibrinogen and of thrombin, which are difficult to prepare and to maintain in a pure state. The principle consists in titrating the antithrombin against normal human plasma; in this way we obtain an estimation of its power to delay coagulation. As the result of examinations carried out by this method, it would seem that there is a wide factor of safety as regards the amount of antithrombin in the human blood, and that this inhibiting substance may be increased to a considerable degree without markedly delaying or endangering clotting.
1. Different strains of Trypanosoma lewisi represent different states of biological balance, especially between the powers of propagation and resistance to destruction. 2. The biological status of a given strain of Trypanosoma lewisi is subject to cyclic variations as the result of immunological reactions in the blood of the host. 3. The factors limiting reproduction and causing destruction of Trypanosoma lewisi in the blood are appreciably independent of each other. It is possible, therefore, to influence these processes separately and even in opposite directions. 4. The virulence of Trypanosoma lewisi, manifested in its highest form, is dependent upon some degree of reproductive fastness, strong antigenic action, and susceptibility to destruction, varying degrees in the development of these properties producing corresponding variations in the degree of virulence. 5. By a properly regulated system of passage the properties of Trypanosoma lewisi that determine its infection cycle and its virulence may be eventually so altered as to change completely both the nature and course of the infection. Such a system of passage must be adapted to the particular strain of Trypanosoma lewisi used. 6. Immunological reactions exercise a dominant influence in determining the ultimate biological variations of Trypanosoma lewisi.
Throughout the investigations upon which a large part of this paper is based the favorable influence of milk feeding on mortality and growth was most apparent. Mortality from all causes was frequently reduced to at least one-half of what obtained among the chicks that received no milk, while the milk-fed chicks in some experiments gained twice as much in weight as those that were without this article of diet. Although the influence of milk feeding was less pronounced on the mortality of chicks that were artificially infected with Bacterium pullorum, quite an appreciable difference in mortality was always noted if the milk was fed at least one or two days before the first administration of the bouillon cultures of the organism in question. Practically the same results were obtained, whether sweet or sour milk was fed, and no differences could be observed in the relative value of ordinary sour milk and of the so called bulgaricus product. Hence, the unique properties of this food exist in the milk as such, rather than in any milk acids or milk bacteria that may be present. Milk and lactose diet exert a very important influence on the character of the intestinal bacteria, especially in white rats and in the common domestic fowl. Within a few days after the ingestion of milk or lactose a transformation of the flora takes place in which the usual mixed bacterial flora give way to ones that are more simplified, and in which Bacillus acidophilus and Bacillus bifidus are, as a rule, prominent. It is to be assumed that milk has this influence in virtue of the large amount of lactose which it contains. Other carbohydrates, besides milk sugar, failed to bring about such a transformation. The ingestion of foreign bacteria, even in large numbers, does not of itself bring about an elimination or displacement of the common intestinal microörganisms. Vastly more important is the influence of diet, especially milk and lactose. The feeding of Bulgara tablets or other preparations which contain as the supposedly active agent the bacillus of Metchnikoff and Mazé, without due regard to the use of milk, can, therefore, be of little, if indeed of any, value. The beneficial effects which it is claimed have been derived from the use of yoghurt, and other oriental sour milk products have in all probability been due to the milk as such, rather than to the bacteria which they contained. This view is strongly supported by the extensive milk feeding experiments on chicks which are recorded in this paper, and also by the results which show the influence of milk and of lactose feeding on the intestinal flora of white rats and of the common domestic fowl.
The addition of a water-clear extract of pneumococci to homologous antiserum produces a voluminous precipitate which carries down with it the agglutinins and practically the totality of the protective bodies against pneumococcus infection in animals. This precipitate when washed and resuspended in saline solution to the original volume of serum protects as well as the whole serum. The protein content of such solutions has varied from 0.09 to 0.34 per cent., as contrasted with about 6 per cent. in the original serum. The solution of this precipitate is not necessary to insure protection, and when produced by dilute alkali (sodium hydrate) frequently destroys the immune bodies.
1. Subcutaneous injections of benzol in rabbits produce marked destructive changes in the hematopoietic organs, especially in the myeloid tissue. 2. Benzol poisoning registers a change not only in the formed elements of the blood, but also in the factors of coagulation. 3. The circulating prothrombin is considerably reduced in amount and in most instances animals in which such a diminution occurs show aplasia of the bone marrow. 4. The association of extreme aplasia of the marrow without a fatal diminution in the circulating prothrombin suggests one of two possibilities: either other tissues and organs in addition to the bone marrow are concerned with prothrombin formation; or a minimum amount of myeloid tissue suffices to maintain the quantity of prothrombin above a dangerous level.
1. Proliferation of connective tissue in chronic uranium nephritis is early and progressive and due to a direct stimulation on the part of the uranium. 2. The hydronephrotic theory fails to explain the phenomena observed in the progress of the chronic nephritis. 3. Carmine is deposited, as shown by Suzuki, in the proximal convoluted tubule only, and in different amounts in different levels of this segment of the tubule, so that subdivisions may be made. 4. Regeneration begins about the fourth day, but varies in proportion to the dose of renal irritant given. 5. The first cells to appear are large vesicular elements, and there is a gradual development of syncytium-like masses and giant-cells. These last are due to the rapidity of cell division. 6. Small, deeply staining nuclei, which are morphologically identical with the newly regenerated cells described by Thorel and others, are present from the first day of the acute nephritis and are persisting renal cells which have been slightly affected by the toxic agent.
In living cultures of various kinds of adult frog tissues, which have been made according to the hanging drop method, there occurs, in many cases, a transformation of the plasma clot by which it becomes entirely changed from a typical fibrin net both in appearance and structure. The changes in the fibrin net generally begin when the culture is from two to three days old. During these changes it appears that the elements of the fibrin net fuse or consolidate, and as a result a great number of fine wavy fibrils are formed which unite to form wavy bundles of fibers, and these freely intertwine and anastomose as they ramify through the area of the plasma clot. The transformation of the fibrin net occurs first in the region of the clot which lies next to the imbedded tissue, gradually extends to the distal regions of the clot, and in time-as a rule in about two weeks-the entire plasma clot becomes changed from the fibrin net into a structure which to all appearances is identical with regular connective tissue. Photographs of both living and preserved cultures have been made to show the course of the transformation of the plasma clot and the development of the fibers. Experiments have been made which show that the fibers which are formed are not outgrowths of the imbedded tissue. Also they are not formed by an intracellular action, but arise directly by a transformation of the fibrin elements of the plasma clot. Experiments have been made which indicate that the transformation of the fibrin net will not occur unless it has come under the influence of living tissues or of living isolated cells. However, mechanical means, such as exerting tension on the clot with needles, may hasten the formation of the fibers. Also, in some cultures, movements of living isolated cells appear to aid in the formation of the fibers. The living tissues alone, however, are able to cause the fibers to form without the aid of any apparent mechanical factor. This is shown by cultures of various tissues in which no cell movement occurs and in which the plasma clot is undisturbed and yet a prolific formation of fibers may take place. Experiments have been made in order to determine the true nature of the transformed plasma clot and to see if the new fibrous tissue were still fibrin in character. The results that have so far been obtained from these tests have not been entirely conclusive and leave the question unsettled. The transformation of the fibrin net results in a shrinkage of the clot. It also becomes very tough and resistant to injury and, therefore, entirely different from the fragile and easily destroyed fibrin net when in its original condition. It is believed that such a reaction must play an important part in wound healing. A study of the relation between connective tissue fibers formed in wound healing and in embryonic development to the fibers formed in the plasma clot is being made, and the results will appear in a later paper.
1. The union of fresh serum of pregnant or immunized animals with the corresponding boiled protein (substratum) is accompanied by the formation of poisonous substances. 2. The poison originates from the serum as a result of its autodigestion, and not from the substratum. 3. The process of autodigestion may be determined by the specific or non-specific removal of the antitrypsin of the serum. 4. The poisons originating from the serum are toxic only for homologous animals. 5. The autodigestion of the serum, if allowed to proceed far enough, may go beyond the toxic stage. 6. The biological properties of these poisons indicate their close similarity to the anaphylatoxin, and suggest that the anaphylatoxin of Friedberger is a product of the autodigestion of serum, and not of the protein outside of the serum.
It is evident from this work and from the work of others that organisms having diphtheroidal morphology are wide-spread in their distribution in the human body. They are readily isolated from miscellaneous skin lesions, probably thriving better in pathological soils as saprophytes than in normal skin, although they can be obtained quite easily from the latter. Various strains can also be cultivated from the air, at least in this environment. Aside from the air and superficial parts of the human body, diphtheroids have frequently been isolated from the deeper regions. Hoag, working on general paresis and certain conditions of the lung, cultivated 199 diphtheroids, the majority of which were from the lungs and respiratory tract, also in some instances from the liver and spleen. He considered 146 of these isolations to be identical and classified them as organism x. Robertson, McRae, and Jeffry likewise in cases of dementia paralytica isolated what they considered an identical strain which was closely related to the Klebs-Loeffler bacillus, from the inflamed ileum, stomach, tonsils or pharynx, bronchi, lung, and brain. They differentiated their organism from Bacillus hoffmanni and Bacillus xerosis. The fact that these organisms have a somewhat unusual morphology, resembling as they do an organism of known pathogenicity, namely. Bacillus diphtherioe, should form no basis for assuming that they, too, are apt to possess these qualities. When we consider the number of simple bacillary contaminators analogous to such organisms as Bacillus anthracis, Bacillus typhosus, etc., we can readily see how frequently this occurs. The majority of the diphtheroids isolated by us stai??? by Gram's method; nearly all fail to resist the standard acid-fast methods, although use of the very low strengths of mineral acids allows the fixed stain to remain in whole or in part. There is consequently nothing unique in their tinctorial properties. These bacillary strains differ considerably in their powers of cultivation. While the majority grow readily upon the ordinary laboratory foodstuffs, others require special products for their growth and still others cannot be grown even where special effort has been made. The fact that many strains grow slowly no doubt enhances their consideration as disease producers, as it seems to argue their difficult adaptation from their preëxisting site to an artificial environment. This reasoning does not apply when we consider the numerous causal agents that can so readily be cultivated directly from the diseased tissue, and again the fact that many saprophytes in their natural habitat are incapable of growth in vitro (figure 1). The most striking of the biological features of these cultures is their wide range of pigment production. While many are white or creamy white, the majority range from a canary yellow to a distinct crimson, and one of the cultures recovered from a leper was a very deep dusky red or garnet. Numerous combined shades of yellow and pink, including such colors as salmon and orange, were present. Some cultures were distinctly pink, others varied in depth of color to a crimson. While many cultures of identical colors were obtained, the majority of strains showed some slight variance of shade. While, of course, the inoculation of diphtheroidal cultures produces varying degrees of localized inflammation if employed in sufficient dosage, probably for the two-fold reason of acting as a foreign body and liberating proteolytic substances, still the diphtheroids isolated in the past have never been able to reproduce the clinical picture of the various diseases from which they were cultivated. The apparent reproduction of lesions in general paresis, in hepatic cirrhosis, and in leprosy does not form an ultimate postulate for the acceptance of organisms as specific etiological entities. This is evidenced by the fact that certain known saprophytic organisms when used as controls are capable of producing the same results. It seems clear that organisms as broadly distributed as the diphtheroids should be suspected as contaminators when met in experiments bearing upon etiology. They should be viewed primarily in the same light as the staphylococcus and the various known contaminating bacteria. It is apparent that this type of organism has been regarded too much from the standpoint of pathogenicity. It is, of course, probable that among this large group there may be a few pathogenic types.
The ordinary virus of poliomyelitis present in aseptically removed brain tissue of paralyzed monkeys survives in an ascitic fluid kidney medium at the temperature of 37 degrees C. for a period of at least twenty, but not of thirty days. Under the conditions of moderate anaerobiosis, the minute microorganism cultivated from poliomyelitic tissues tends not to develop in cultures from the brain tissue; hence its presence does not complicate the survival test. The diffusion of the ordinary poliomyelitic virus from a noncomminuted fragment of brain tissue into a surrounding medium of ascitic fluid is so slight as not to be detectable by inoculation experiments conducted with usual quantities of the fluid. The specific effects of the microörganism cultivated from poliomyelitic tissues are not caused by an admixture in the cultures of the ordinary virus of poliomyelitis; hence they must be caused by the pathogenic action of the microörganism itself. The minute microörganism is therefore to be regarded as the specific microbic cause of epidemic poliomyelitis.
Antidysenteric serum can be safely prepared in the horse by the method of three successive intravenous injections of living cultures or toxin with intervening rest periods of seven days. When this method of immunization is employed, the specific antibodies responsible for agglutination and protection appear early and rise rapidly. By inoculating alternately living dysentery bacilli belonging to the Shiga and Flexner groups a polyvalent serum of high titer may be prepared. A polyvalent serum so produced should be suitable for the therapeutic treatment of acute bacillary dysentery, irrespective of the particular strain or strains of the dysentery bacillus causing the infection. An effective antidysentery serum suitable for therapeutic employment in man can be prepared in the horse in about ten weeks.
1. Pronounced cases of Barlow's disease may be produced in the fetus as early as ten to fifteen days after the commencement of dieting pregnant guinea pigs with oats and water. There are wide individual variations. The scorbutic changes in the skeleton are greatest in the earlier embryonic stages. The fetuses of that period, with practically no exceptions, die and show marked traces of impeded growth. 2. Fetuses from the later period of pregnancy are born alive, and apparently fully developed, with comparatively slight changes in the osseous system. 3. Even a short extension of the period of extra-uterine dieting on milk from scorbutic mothers and later on oats and water is sufficient to change the latent scurvy into a highly pronounced case. 4. The fetus cannot be kept alive longer than the adult animal, about twenty-eight days, either by intra-uterine dieting alone or by combined intra- and extra-uterine dieting. 5. The mothers show signs of disease at an early period, and are more severely attacked than non-pregnant animals. Death also occurs comparatively often in the first period of gestation.
Vaccine virus freed from all associated bacteria by means of suitable disinfecting agents can be propagated in a pure state in the testicles of rabbits and bulls. The virus cultivated in this manner is not only devoid of all bacteria, but appears capable of indefinite transfer from one animal to another. Sixty passages in rabbits of a pure strain have been made within one year. Several transfers from testicle to testicle are required to bring about accurate adaptation of the virus to the testicular parenchyma, so that continued propagation in this way can be certainly secured. During the first transfers from testicle to testicle the activity of the virus may be less than the original skin specimen from which the pure strain was derived; but as the transfers proceed the activity rises until, when the adaptation is complete, the activity of the testicular equals that of the skin strain. The multiplication of the virus within the testicle is maximum on the fourth or fifth day after inoculation; the quantity of virus remains about stationary until the eighth day, when diminution begins. At the expiration of five weeks no more virus could be detected in the testicle. The vaccinal processes in the skin, cornea, and testicle of rabbits are practically identical whether the virus employed for the inoculation has been the original skin strain or the pure testicular strain; and the skin lesions produced in the calf with the two strains are also identical. In conformity with the finding mentioned in the last paragraph it has been found that human beings react to the pure testicular strain of vaccine virus in an entirely typical manner. In the case both of original vaccination and revaccination the vaccinal effects cannot be distinguished from those arising from uncomplicated skin virus. Pure strains of testicular virus are readily produced, and once secured they may be propagated in a pure state by the method described in rabbits or bulls without difficulty and with economy. The pure strains thus obtained should supply an ideal form of virus for employment in the vaccination of human beings.
By feeding to rats the tissue of the mouse chondroma they are rendered more suitable as hosts for the growth. Using this method rats have been inoculated successfully with the mouse tumor and it has been transferred to three successive series of these animals.
Arsenic and arsenious acids, cacodylic acid, atoxyl, and neosalvarsan fail to influence markedly the growth of the Rous chicken sarcoma.
It has been shown by our experiments that the serum of rabbits treated with emulsions of Treponema pallidum contains agglutinating substances. Normal rabbit serum also possesses agglutinating power for this organism, but, as in the case of normal bacterial agglutinins, to an extent very much inferior to that possessed by the sera of immunized animals. Normal human sera will agglutinate similar pallidum emulsions, as will the sera of certain syphilitic patients with positive Wassermann reactions. Whether or not there is a quantitative difference of diagnostic value between the sera of normal human beings and those of syphilitics remains to be seen. The sera of rabbits immunized with strain A agglutinate Noguchi's strain 9 in dilutions as high as 1 to 500. We regard as the most important result of these experiments the demonstration of definite antibodies in the circulation of animals treated with dead emulsions of Treponema pallidum. Since it is our belief that the agglutinating effect is due to an antibody essentially the same as that which produces bactericidal, precipitating, and opsonic effects, i. e., that there is probably one type of antibody only, we believe that the demonstration of agglutinins establishes the fact that in syphilis as in bacterial diseases the host responds by the formation of antibodies or sensitizers specific for the treponema. Spirocheticidal experiments with these sera, both in vitro and in vivo, are in progress.
1. The malarial parasite is extracellular throughout its entire life cycle; that is, when it is not free in the blood serum, it is attached to the external surface of the red corpuscle. 2. Adult parasites follow the same procedure in attaching themselves to the outer surface of the red corpuscles as do the young parasites. 3. Adult parasites are most frequently seen attached to surface corpuscular mounds. 4. Corpuscular mounds projecting at the periphery of the red corpuscles and encircled by the pseudopodia of adult parasites, are proof positive of the extracellular relation of the adult parasite to the red corpuscle. 5. Adult parasites attached to peripheral corpuscular mounds are only found in appreciable numbers when the red corpuscles are not badly damaged, so that the mounds show more or less hemoglobin content. 6. The nuclei or protoplasm of adult parasites extending beyond the periphery of the red corpuscles is additional evidence of the extracellular relation of the parasites to the red corpuscle.
It has been shown in this investigation that digitalis, administered orally to patients, can modify the T wave in the electrocardiogram. When the T wave in the initial curve is directed upward, the first change noticed is a lowering, and the final change is an inversion of the wave. It is not only the wave itself, but that portion of the curve between the end of R and the end of T which is involved. Instances in which the initial T waves have other than upright forms are described and their behavior under the influence of digitalis has been indicated. This influence of digitalis on the T wave may be detected in thirty-six to forty-eight hours after the administration of digitalis has commenced; it may persist as long as twenty-two days after the administration has been stopped. Instances where it persisted only five days have been encountered. The unexpected length of duration of the sign probably explains why a second treatment with digitalis requires a smaller amount of the drug to produce the same effect, than the first.
While preliminary treatment with culture filtrates or dead cells of the extremely virulent strain A gave rise to varying degrees of immunity, the exudative lung lesions developing after tracheal injection with live organisms of the same virulent strain were not strikingly increased in any group or series of these rabbits. Despite carefully graduated dosage in the preliminary treatment, none of the animals developed symptoms of a definitely anaphylactic nature. In similar experiments following sensitization with the attenuated avirulent culture AA, tracheal injection of virulent or avirulent organisms of the same strain failed to incite any definite increase in the exudative lung reaction. In none of the rabbits were symptoms resembling anaphylaxis noted. The immunity which was induced by the larger sensitizing doses of culture filtrates of the strain in the virulent state was lacking when similar doses of the culture filtrates of organisms in the non-virulent state were used. Extensive lesions developed in both sensitized and unsensitized rabbits when the strain used in the tracheal injection was one apparently combining moderate virulence with exceptional toxicity, indicating that the exudative lung reaction was one of adjustment rather than of acquired hypersusceptibility. When, in the experiments, small amounts of sera from normal rabbits, or from animals immunized to culture filtrates, were added to the culture before tracheal injection, an increased fibrinous lung reaction was frequently found. The present study would seem to give some ground for the view that while in pneumonia a hypersensitive condition probably takes some part in the inception of the infection, the subsequent development of the diffuse exudative reaction in the lung is not directly due to an acquired hypersusceptibility, but to intrinsic qualities possessed by the pneumococcus itself. This study was carried on in the Department of Bacteriology of the College of Physicians and Surgeons of Columbia University, New York, and later, through the courtesy of Dr. Charles Norris, in the Bellevue Hospital Laboratories. It was completed in the Laboratories of the New York State Department of Health at Albany. I am greatly indebted to Dr. Augustus Wadsworth for his advice and criticism.
In the study of the human cortex it seems well to follow the same primary divisions for the entire cortex, while in certain areas some layers may assume certain modifications; viz., in the area striata it seems clearer to retain the sixth layer ground type, of which the fourth is subdivided into three secondary layers. The visual cortex, on account of its relation to the act of seeing, is an especially interesting field for study. About the calcarine fissure one can readily see with the naked eye a stripe of white fibers lying in the gray substance, called stria of Gennari or of Vicq-d' Azyr. This layer is considered by Brodmann in the second subdivision of the fourth primary layer. The two most characteristic types of the cortex are the giant pyramid type, called area gigantopyramidalis, and the calcarine type, called area striata. The higher types of mammals afford excellent material for comparison. Minkowski's experimental study of the dog indicates that the clinical, anatomical visual sphere is covered with the cytoarchitectonic sphere; for lasting visual trouble can be caused only by extirpation of the area striata. The subcortical visual center in mammals undergoes secondary degeneration through destruction of the area striata, and therefore depends on the cortex. Also certain parts of the corpus geniculatum externum have an exact projection over certain areas of the cortex.
Some strains of Bacillus proteus obtained from human lesions are pathogenic for rabbits, rats, and guinea pigs. There is good evidence that these strains are also pathogenic for man. All cultures obtained from sources other than human infections were non-pathogenic for the laboratory animals. A non-pathogenic culture may be made pathogenic by the use of aggressins or by inoculation into the anterior chamber of the eye. Proteus cultures lose their virulence rapidly when grown on artificial media. The lesions produced in animals are either simple abscesses, proliferative lesions, or a mixed exudative and proliferative lesion. The proliferative lesions consist mainly of epithelioid cells apparently of connective tissue origin. No giant-cells of the Langhans type are present. The histological type of the lesion does not depend upon the strain employed. Neither does it bear any relation to the clinical severity of the case. The ability to produce the characteristic lesions has no necessary connection with the toxicity of the bacteria. The proteus bacteria probably play a more important part in human pathology than is generally believed.
1. Ethylhydrocuprein hydrochloride in very high dilution inhibits the growth of, and in 18 hours kills, representatives of all four groups of pneumococci in vitro. The killing effect is generally seen in somewhat lower dilutions than the inhibiting effect. No constant or considerable difference is seen in these actions on representatives of the four groups of the pneumococci. The action of ethylhydrocuprein hydrochloride on the pneumococci in vitro is so strongly specific that it may possibly be used as a test for a true pneumococcus. 2. The inhibitory or killing effects of ethylhydrocuprein hydrochloride in vitro on bacteria other than pneumococci are slight or absent. The effects are greater on streptococci than on any other organisms examined, but are still much less than on the pneumococci. This action distinguishes between the streptococcus group, including Streptococcus mucosus sometimes found in normal mouths, on the one hand, and the true pneumococcus (including Pneumococcus mucosus), on the other. 3. Quinine hydrochloride inhibits the growth of, and kills the pneumococcus in vitro; much stronger concentrations, however, are necessary than in the case of ethylhydrocuprein. This effect of quinine hydrochloride is also seen on other organisms, but in a less degree. 4. Ethylhydrocuprein (optochin base) has a well marked protective action against experimental pneumococcal infection in mice in the case of type strains of all four groups of pneumococci; this protective action may be efficient against many multiples of the minimum lethal dose.
